Supported Proposal of France
The meeting of the committee in the parliament house on Friday in the leadership of the Committee Chairman Mushahid Hussain Syed, a parliamentary delegation of representatives of all political parties in the country in which it was suggested that the relief goods sent to Palestine.
Talking to the media after the meeting, Mushahid Hussain Syed said that the committee has welcomed the proposal given by France, which has said that Israel take immediate ceasefire and allow apart from the relief work for affected people in Gaza.
Declared a crime against humanity to attack by Israel, he said that all countries should condemn these attacks
Target of criticism to double standards of the countries of the world, Mushahid Hussain said that the people are talking against terrorism, but he now on the attacks on Palestinians by Israel, why are silent.
The Chairman of the Senate Standing Committee on foreign affairs on the frosty targeted criticism of the leaders of the Ummah.
He said that the committee expressed the hope that the newly elected President of the United States, Barak will address the Muslim Ummah during the first 100 days of his government, the Gulf created so between the United States and the Muslim Ummah could be abolished.
Mushahid Hussain Syed said that the space created between Muslims and the west to be resolved not only be emergency measures, but the old issues like Kashmir and Palestine.
State Minister of Foreign Affairs country Ammad Khan told the committee that they are going to Saudi Arabia to participate in the meeting of the foreign ministers of the Organization of Islamic countries.
The emergency meeting was called by Israel as a result of the attacks on. He said that Palestine is aware of, and in this regard, the government is in touch with the leaders of other countries.
State Minister of Foreign Affairs said that Palestine should be resolved according to UN resolutions.
Two journalists belonging to the Arab countries have also participated in the meeting, and he informed the meeting about the latest situation in Palestine.
Meanwhile in Islamabad, the International University students demonstrated against the Israeli attacks on Palestine.
The protesters raised banners and slogans against Israel were registered on which were set.
To Prevent Bird Flu to Avoid
American scientists made on this research has emerged after the experiences.
This experience has proved that we were set on the food was less capable of dealing with the flu virus.
The research is proved the old adage has proved wrong, that fast in the fever to improve. &quot;
According to the scientists during fever-screening.
All investigations of State University says that take less ability to fight the infection was found, and the possibility of his death was also increased while normal food was much resistance power against the flu virus in the parties.
According to professor from bird flu, the people will not only affect very soon, but also that they will take more time.
He also said that those people who have taken the flu vaccine, they should also refrain from during the winter months.
&quot;The First Nuclear Test Was in 1990.
Thomas red Unilever national laboratory in the United States are already working on the basis of this book is written with the cooperation of the technical intelligence, former Director of the National laboratory.
It has been written and said that the two writers have claimed that the country has also made a nuclear bomb or from a book, the proliferation of nuclear express: The political history of the bomb and it, the title, are nuclear secrets, or any other country, then it is to get the cooperation of the other nuclear powers.
Thomas Red said in an interview to the news that China has experienced Pakistan&apos;s first nuclear bomb in the era of Benazir Bhutto in 19 100 90.
Thomas Red said that on the basis of many reasons, he is sure that China had experienced Pakistan&apos;s first nuclear bomb.
Reasons include the information obtained by the bomb during talks with the scientists of the design and China.
He further said that the reason was that 19 100 in Pakistan had been able to only two weeks and nuclear test in response to India&apos;s nuclear test within three days.
The Red Thomas reminded that 19 100 in Russia was the sudden nuclear test and it was organized 17 days in response to the experience in the United States, despite the fact that the United States have many times, the bomb was present.
He further said that the May 19 100 in Pakistan, which had experienced a nuclear bomb he was made with great care and had full confidence on the Pakistani scientists.
Thomas red when this question was that China has provided Nuclear Technology to Pakistan, he said in reply, because India was the common enemy of Pakistan and China.
He said that the proof is present that Dr Abdul Qadeer Khan used only Chinese design, besides this, after the documents were obtained from Libya with them, it has been confirmed.
To a question on what is common to jointly nuclear tests, he said, Turkey made open in the desert of the United States and Britain was for a nuclear test.
He said that we also do this speculation that Israel was also provided access to the results of this experience.
From Thomas red, this question was whether China has issued a program of nuclear proliferation.
On this, Thomas Red said that 19 100 with China is providing the raw material for nuclear installation, instructions and set up in the city of Iran.
Besides, China has also provided enrichment plant in Iran.
He said that China is providing nuclear technology to Iran, Syria, Pakistan, Egypt, Libya and Yemen by North Korea.
Best for Hearing
The show was created,, the basis of, and it includes a song or two with Ukraine or civil band and Justin.
It was kept on an old car.
The year 2000 was the second most successful show the terms of the profit of 8 million million dollars which were obtained.
Canadian show,, visited 24 countries and were in only 17 countries, which was the first international tour in the last eight years.
Both singers show King, Director, girl, the union, refunds, visit arrangements were also.
The year 2000 has established in six has broken the record.
Was he, 19 million in the year 2000 in six million dollars.
The third most successful singer declared that the 17 million to $60 million.
Bruce has been $60 million, 16 million, on the fourth and fifth Police numbers and their part in 12 million came to $6 million.
According to the magazine, 8 in year 2000 in North America, very few people attended the concert and song programs, and only the people were involved in those who were ready to buy expensive tickets.
In the United States, a 8 percent increase in the price of tickets and show in the most expensive tickets was sold over three and a half.
Embracing the editor of the magazine, said that in the view of international economic market, this action was to be a good year for 8 year 2000.
He forecast to be a good year for the year 2000 to U 9 and which are issued this year.
The Ban on Education Coalition: Taliban
The location of North Waziristan, Hafiz Gul Bahadur group in Miran Shah and other districts, local Taliban has distributed a pahmphlet in which official and semi-official their educational institutions have been threatened in which coalition education is being given to boys and girls.
In pahmphlet is that if the coalition educational institutions till January 5 was not closed, action against them will be started.
In pahmphlet is that government aid and other educational issues will be imposed on the identity card of women and for women has also refused to go to NADRA offices in all districts.
The ban on the identity card of women from local Taliban was announced at a time when about 200 women in offices have been collected form for the identity card for a support programme in North Waziristan.
According to local people, pahmphlet issued by Taliban read loud-speaker of all the mosques of North Waziristan.
However, the letter was not mentioned is that the girls will be imposed on different educational institutions or not.
According to pahmphlet in case of any woman to go to school or NADRA office was, the woman and her family will be punished just after the announcement, to receive education or to make the identity card.
Besides, in the Bannu district police said that one pedestrian was killed and one injured in a landmine explosion on Sunday Bannu Road that result.
The injured are admitted to the civil hospital in Bannu.
&quot;Target Crane,, More Bodies Recovered
According to police on Sunday morning, the location of green Chowk area and Sohrab Khan are four corpses of two people were separated from his body.
Those killed is being reported from the Frontier Corps and police.
Witnesses say that dead bodies found near a letter in which he was warned that that someone has also raised before 11 am to these bodies himself of his death will be responsible.
Local people said that till 11 am bodies are lying in the market, but later transferred to take security officials of the two bodies.
See a dangerous extent increase in incidents of target crane during the last few weeks in the areas around the location and
Is there in which civilians including women and security personnel have been killed.
According to local sources, now has been killed more than 30 people in such incidents.
So far, no organization has claimed responsibility for the killings.
In Swat on Saturday, local Taliban spokesman Muslim Khan told BBC that on Friday, there were three bodies of his colleagues in the bodies which include the body of the Taliban commander Rafi Ullah.
The Muslim Khan said that Rafi Ullah was in the custody of the security forces over the past 15 months.
He said that when a local Taliban do killed, first issued a notice to this, on the other hand, issued in these incidents is found on severe concern in ordinary citizens.
Local people say that a large contingent of security forces are stationed in, but it is increasing despite attacks on citizens.
Benazir in Tribute
Was recorded in the voice of a rape, lance (a way of modern music) has now been post on the Tube.
Five minutes on the pictures and video of Benazir Bhutto was given.
18-year-old where? the student of the university.
He is poetry and deep concern.
It is said that he was apparently start singing after the encouragement of his mother.
He has said while offering a tribute to his mother, &quot;You were beautiful and intelligent, you have made every work in a way.&quot;
He said about the incident of December 27 that you were our views, flour, we in the age at the temple, three children to leave survived.
The whole nation are less hope and you are in the heart of all these.
After a 20-year-old Bhutto in children of Benazir Bhutto is number 2.
They are quietly interest to started in music.
Is that he had expressed a desire to meet award Laureate music producer and Dad through a journalist friend in America before the return of his mother. But it could not meet him.
Some of the poetry of Sindhi newspapers had published translated, but his voice being heard through the tube for the first time.
Some workers of Benazir Bhutto and the rich people started lance C. rape.
On the other hand, Pakistan People&apos;s Party spokesman Farhatullah Babar has confirmed that poetry and voice of the present on the Tube.
The government of Pakistan have been issued on a TV network, on the phone from Islamabad, he said that this is a rich tribute to their joint venture mother of a daughter.
Farhatullah Babar has said that his party program to distribute C., etc., has not made per movement.
He said that a few months ago, a young year Chairman of his party on the web site before the fee was made a fake bank account or Bhutto Zardari after which have been removed.
Ajmal Butcher Is Only Pakistani: Information Minister
The Federal Minister for Information and Broadcasting, Sherry Rehman were sent to the BBC Urdu service in a message S. M. S. Ajmal butcher confirming the citizenship, so just said that further investigation is underway.
Prior to this, Prime Minister advisor Interior Rehman had refused to Pakistani citizenship of the country.
He said that the citizens to record the Agency, they found no record of Ajmal.
It could not be known about the recent announcement that the government of Pakistan on what basis now to change its stand, Ajmal butcher citizenship is confirmed.
However, according to the Foreign Ministry spokesman Ajmal butcher citizenship is confirmed by the Interior Ministry.
Before this, the BBC Urdu service and a few other newspapers and TV channels had said Ajmal butcher from Farid Kot town of Okara district of Punjab province.
However, the government was to deny it.
However, it is not clear that this is concerned with this Farid Kot Ajmal or any other area.
The Rocket Fire from Lebanon, Retaliatory Bombardment
Israeli army and police officials told the representatives of the media, which is that the Lebanese area were four rockets on Israeli soil, which fell in a northern Israeli town, lightly injuring two people.
The Israeli battery in response to rockets were the result from the area of Lebanon has bombarded Lebanon.
It is not clear that this is not the Hezbollah attack or behind it, it is the hand of active Palestinian groups in Lebanon.
Who is behind these rocket attacks that the Lebanese government has said that he is also trying to assess whether it.
BBC correspondent has declared it issued a very dangerous turn for the recent crisis in the region.
According to BBC editor for the Middle East, their rocket attacks has increased the threat of war to spread.
The past few days, it should not spread the operation in Gaza expressed their apprehension that was being anywhere in north to Israel&apos;s border with Lebanon.
On the other hand, between Wednesday and Thursday night, the Israeli air force has been 60 air strike on the Gaza strip.
According to the Israeli army, police offices of Hamas, sheepish, weapons water reserves, the places and Hamas weapons closed workers to the rocket fire was targeted in these attacks.
Besides the air attacks from the battery, the Israeli army and Navy continued the bombardment on Gaza throughout the night.
Palestinian sources said that the air attacks has destroyed a mosque in Gaza City.
According to Unconfirmed reports, the tanks of the Israeli army, which was presented by the area of Khan Younis help air by helicopter.
Seven hundred Palestinian who is involved in a large number of women and children were killed in the fighting on the last 12 days.
While on the other hand, 11 soldiers of the Israeli army were also killed.
The Israeli security forces, it has been confirmed that a top defense officials are going to Cairo to decide the terms of the cease-fire.
A delegation of Hamas is also going to Cairo for parallel talks with the ambassadors of Egypt.
Besides this, the leader of the Palestinian Authority, Mahmoud Abbas will arrive in Cairo on Friday.
My Heart Is Shattered, My Kidney Demanded Back
Dr. Richard said that he had donated them as their flock to save his wife eight years ago.
According to the AFP news agency, Dr. says that his wife has given the reward for his donation, that they were deceived and to establish relations with others and now refer to divorce.
Dr. said in an interview with a local newspaper daily news that the alleged has given a hole in my heart, which is now.
According to the lawyer of Dr. Richard, otherwise, Dr. are demanding the return of his kidney, but in fact they want equal subsidies worth.
According to his wife, he will present their stand in front of a judge in the next few days.
The 140-Year-Old, 9 Kilo Free
&quot;George, the joint, was held two weeks ago with a sea.
The city&apos;s sea food company had purchased it in 100 dollars.
And immediately started to use for its publication of the pictures.
However, a group,, who works for the protection of animals has demanded to leave now as a result of which it back will be left in the sea.
George was held to sea in Canada, after which he spent 10 days in the tank of the city crepe and C. food company.
To be the weight of this idea of the age.
The manager of the restaurant, said that his intention was not to revive a loss to the tank, it was meant to provide goods to the interest of the consumers.
The protection of animals belonging to the organization, said that the decision of the restaurant is excellent and is an example for those who want to keep such rare animals or, in a tank or want to eat him alive fever.
For a Baby with Help of Mobile
When the authorities found about, city police officer and extinguish the forces were coming in action.
Officials with the help of the girl&apos;s mobile present G. P. S. anticipated direction of the right place.
However, street walked this direction with the help of the elections that the child is in a hotel.
A week ago, on grandparents, were taken from the supervision of their legal parents.
The police chief told BBC, he said that he is not returned ever now. and then he went to leave the state.
Police have set up contact with Ms. but when according to promise he did not return to police has decided to find it through mobile phones.
Two thousand five law or in the United States is that the companies providing mobile service should provide 67 percent and 95 percent of the distance of 300 meters from the distance of 100 meters.
Hamid Karzai on a Visit to India
Hamid Karzai is the second Indian tour in five months.
The hope is that he will talk about the situation after the extremist attacks in Mumbai during a meeting with Prime Minister.
During this visit, he wants to show their solidarity with India and feelings of Mumbai attacks on Afghanistan and its people.
During the visit of Karzai, mutual trade in extremism will be discussed.
Extremism, for mutual cooperation between the two countries is expected to be discussed.
During his last visit to India, President Hamid Karzai said that terrorism will not allow hampering relations between India and Afghanistan.
He also said that both India and Afghanistan to face the challenge of terrorism and his mercy and assassination operations.
The two countries, peace and stability of the region and the entire world is beneficial for all.
&quot;We believe the ownership by both countries and the entire world, it can face condemnation of terrorism.
It should be noted that last year in July was settled for the attack on the Indian embassy in Kabul, Karzai said Pakistan&apos;s ISI intelligence agencies responsible.
Four Indians, including a high I. F. S. personnel, were killed in the attack.
After the attack on the embassy, Karzai during the visit of Indian Prime Minister Singh had said that the attack was attacked with India and Afghanistan, we also agreed that we will not allow obstacles between their ties to terrorism.
The Mumbai Attack, Special Judge for Hearing
Mumbai police commissioner Hassan Ghafoor has said that it will be under the supervision of the hearing, M. L. were arrested, only has registered a case against the accused Ajmal Amir butcher during the attacks of the extremists on the Mumbai.
Earlier, in this matter, has been appointed as the government lawyer.
Ajmal butcher are currently in the custody of the police and the hope is that the police will bring admitted the charge sheets against them before January 24.
Ajmal butcher have no lawyer to his defense.
Butcher in a letter written to the Pakistan government had appealed for legal aid.
India has been delegated evidences of Pakistani militants to be included in the Mumbai attacks.
Pakistan has accepted that Ajmal butcher is Pakistani citizens.
According to a police case Ajmal and his colleague, Abu Ismail, A. T. S. Chief expert of winter, additional police commissioner Ashok, police inspector and six policemen were killed after their car was snatched, they escaped later D. B route was held near.
Police action was located in the death of Ismail Khan, and the police had arrested Ajmal alive.
Ajmal any lawyer till now has not been nominated for the prosecution of the case.
The government legal aid cell which lawyer was nominated to the Danish capital, he had refused to take the case on moral grounds.
Two lawyers have taken back its name after the protests of the people of a political party and opposition.
The Constitutional Amendment: &quot;Committee Will Be Formed&quot;
Talking to the media after addressing a on environmental changes in Islamabad on Tuesday, he said that a meeting of the parliamentary party would be called in this regard, in which the committee will be formed.
He said that so far, by the Muttahida Qaumi Movement, for the end of 17th amendment, the constitutional amendment bill has been presented in the National Assembly and other political parties will also presented a constitutional amendment bill in parliament in this regard.
He said that for the end of 17th amendment, Pakistan People&apos;s Party has also sent a copy to all the political parties and the committee will also examine the draft resolution.
In response to a question, he said that the Parliament will decide the balance of power between the President and the Prime Minister.
The Prime Minister said that Parliament is empowered to all decisions.
In response to another question, he said that the former president to leave the post of the army chief, retired General Pervez Musharraf regarding besides the role of political parties, former Prime Minister and Chairperson of Pakistan People&apos;s Party Benazir Bhutto is also an important role, who urged the international community to deploy uniforms on former President Pervez Musharraf emphasized.
He said that US Vice President elected and Pakistan who are pro-democracy and their services in the President of Pakistan has given the Crescent of Pakistan.
After another incident due to which they give such statements by the Indian government, in response to a question about the threat to cut all ties with Pakistan Yusuf Raza Gilani said that the Indian Government is the severe pressure of people.
To Protest Against Dismissal of Journalists
Islamabad under Islamabad on Tuesday, J. R. I. U. of journalists, media owners and government and protest on journalists and newspaper workers of a large number of employees from the TV channels and newspapers, shouted slogans in front of the Press Club.
Addressing the demonstrators, the largest organization of journalists, a senior member of the Pakistan federal Union of Journalists, C. R. Shamsi said that until yesterday, the political freedoms were protest on roads with us today they are sitting in the house with the ruling, but due to a particular fear of newspaper owners, doing nothing for the rights of journalists.
He said that the newspaper owners to talk of human rights has kept its institutions on the punishment and the impressment camp where billions of rupees annually workers despite the extremely low charges and is being dismissed by their economic murder.
The example of Lahore, a private TV channel, a member of five is our front which was Suicide from four months for not receiving wages, and even today, many workers are spending their lives of trouble due to non-payment of the repressive and months salary.
He said that direct action against TV and newspaper owners should and need to set up a permanent protest in front of the Parliament for the rights of journalists.
Target of criticism to the governor of Punjab Salman operating C. R. Shamsi said that his Urdu newspapers, today, employees is being wrong side without any notice.
While the daily Jinnah, daily news, channel five, business plus TV and TV today has also dismissed dozens of employees
Addressing the demonstrators P. U. F. J. Secretary General Mazhar Abbas said that today journalistic organizations throughout the country are celebrating a black day against journalists and newspaper workers and journalists to obtain their rights in a Parliament session will be controlled on the black.
According to Mazhar Abbas, workers and journalists in Pakistan percent newspapers and TV channels is being exploited, where they are working without any agreement.
He said that so far, more than 200 workers and journalists are being expelled from newspapers and TV channels, and it is feared that this year, owners will dismiss more hundreds of workers as well as the economic crisis.
Until the seventh Wage Board dismissed employees has not been restored. The newspaper to determine the wages of the workers, the enforcement of the award is not the payment of salaries was stopped from several months of employees of the newspapers and TV channels, Mazhar Abbas will continue until the movement of journalists.
A 11-Member Cabinet Took Oath
Six anti-Muslim Conference of Ateeq Ahmad Khan, former Prime Minister in the new cabinet, two, peoples of Pakistan People&apos;s Party are two of the Muslim League and a minister of the Muttahida Qaumi Movement.
Are also a woman Minister in the 11-member cabinet, and they belong to immemorial anti-Muslim Conference.
Ruling alliance says that next week in the cabinet will be extended and more is likely to be included in a dozen cabinet minister, it should be noted that earlier this month, Sardar Ateeq Khan, his opponents had withdrawn from the post of Minister Azmi through a no-confidence motion and Sardar Yaqub Khan was elected new prime minister.
The departments of these ministers will be announced later.
Swearing on the occasion of the Pakistan People&apos;s Party activists shouted slogans in favor of former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto.
Thirtyfive Million Consumers from Virus Affected
In October, two thousand eight, was first identified, the hospital is known by names like this virus, down and up and.
Despite this stick around thirtyfive million computers and have been affected by this had issued a plot to deal with this virus.
Experts say that the number of the computers to be affected can be quite large.
To deal with this, consumers need to use, M. S. zero 8 zero 7, perplexedness.
Says that the virus to affect hundreds of thousands of computers to search for a file, services India E. S. E., and it is included in the Code.
After that, it is a file system in D. L. L. type of the virus.
This virus is to create the name of this file.
Then, the details of the registration of change.
This virus is to create a problem after being active, H. T. T. P Sarwar, has come forth and to change the point of the machine.
After this, the files from the web site is loaded down.
Says that this virus has affected computers in various countries of the world.
These countries are China, Brazil, Russia, India, the United States and Britain.
&quot;Demanded on Indian Information&quot;
Talking to the media after a meeting in the interior ministry on Saturday, he said that he has given by India to the
One will help in investigating this matter.
He said that Pakistan is an independent country and have any country in the investigation on the information received from India
Will not accept increasing.
He said that the information and other information received by India.
Interior Minister said that law enforcing agencies had been taken in custody under suspicion glitch peace to the members of an outlawed organization
And if they found no evidence against some people will take action against them, and innocent people should be released.
In response to a question, he said that any person who was arrested would not be handed over to India and Pakistan will be the action, according to the laws against these people.
He said that action against these people has been FIA under the law.
In response to a question, he said that Indian law enforcement agencies involved in the Mumbai incident, people have information about 42 days, so he is hopeful that the international community, including India, will give some time to Pakistan for investigation on his heart.
He again repeated the offer of the government that Mumbai to form a joint team for investigation.
It should be noted that additional director general of FIA has been formed a three-member team lead the Mumbai attacks by India
Is investigating the information to Pakistan.
In India, Pakistan&apos;s High Commissioner, Shahid Malik, met with the President of Asif Ali Zardari, in which the President made it clear that if any Pakistani individual or group was found involved in the Mumbai attacks, against this country will take action according to the law, and no one will be handed over to India and the Indian leadership is put constant pressure on Pakistan relating to India&apos;s reference to those involved in the incident.
&quot;Anything Is Possible in United States.
Mr. will take oath as President of the United States on January 20.
In Washington, the President of the United States, addressing a music concert by standing on the construction of the building in memory of Sri Lankan
While Mr. that, the United States is facing the most serious of several generations, and he is hopeful that the United States will control on these problems.
Sri Lankan had removed the tradition of slavery in the United States.
But even with Mr. said that time and route in solving the problems facing the country will be difficult.
&quot;but despite this, I am hopeful that the country will keep the dream alive.
In addition to the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, the United States is pouch with a severe financial crisis.
Swearing extraordinary steps are being taken for the ceremony.
Organizers believe that 20 million people will be involved in the ceremony.
On Monday, a national holiday in the United States because the same day, a great standard of human rights, and Martin King was killed.
Martin King were black.
Appreciating Tribute to Martin, Determined to Work
Dr. Martin King, 19, was killed in 100.
Did the tribute to Dr. King, and the Americans said that they should work together to fulfill the promise of the nation.
Meanwhile, in Washington, the ceremony of the new president on Tuesday took over the preparation of a gathering on the occasion of the people are.
It is expected that this historic oath of the president to see President almost 20 thousand people will be collected in Washington.
From the beginning of the day on Monday in a medical center in northern Washington visit where he met the wounded American soldiers, after that, they were in a shelter set up for homeless and colors on a wall.
Talking to reporters, said: &quot;in the present crisis that we are facing and the problems, many people have been surrounded, then we will not sit discharged.
He said that Martin King has spent in the service of their more people.
That said, &quot;today when we are respect for his memory, this day is that we should be and stay. This is the day that we should act.
He said that the ceremony on Tuesday will be the same path on which several thousand people, Martin King, &quot;I have a dream, listened to 19 100 were collected.
In his speech, Martin King had said that the day will come when people see their colors, discrimination would not be allowed.
BBC Mathew Price says that injustice aspect of history is that day Martin came 24 hours before the day when the first black President of American history will take oath of his office.
The President, Dr. King dream for many people in the southern states of the United States will be considerable.
Additional Political Agent.
Additional political agent of unknown year 10 days ago from South Waziristan.
The sources say that the official was kidnapped the local Taliban Mullah Nazir group.
According to the local administration at 4 pm on Tuesday, Amir Latif near the additional political agent of South Waziristan, a tribal jirga has reached the Wana Scouts camp.
However, he has not revealed how additional political agent who had been kidnapped.
However, local people say that political agent was abducted by local Taliban Mullah Nazir group.
Amir Latif was kidnapped at this time, when he was going to Pakistan.
Two thousand Nine including seven armed veil in the tribal region of South Waziristan, additional political agent Amir Latif driver abducted on January 11.
According to the official, kidnapping group was disarmed guards in the first car, and after the additional political agent were taken to be installed in a car.
According to the local administration, additional political agent was kidnapped after the security forces surrounded the detention of all checkpoints in South Waziristan and semi-tribal areas, and those coming from the strict search was being taken and the last one week, officials also set economic ban on Pakistan.
8 December two thousand up the North Waziristan political agent asmat ullah was kidnapped at the time when he was going to Bannu to celebrate the Eid holidays. and the two people, including a few days after the Tehsildar Amanullah in North Waziristan, unknown, the veil was killed.
Victory in Court of British
The 42-year-old British citizen has admitted that he was the American military website.
Embracing Asperger patient. It should be noted that only one way to Asperger&apos;s patients is an aberration to work.
His lawyers have said that if they were handed over to the United States, the fear is that he will try to committed suicide.
Government lawyers, however, said that concerns about the health of embracing is very low.
Lord justice and Justice Simon said that the decision is permitted embracing that they can apply for a British court review.
Embracing of lawyers, the court had adopted the position that if embracing was removed from his home and family, he can committed suicide
He further said that it did not consider the Home Secretary.
But government lawyers said that the Home secretary had used their powers.
Embracing has never is not denied to US military website.
Embracing the two thousand was one and two American computer system which has caused a loss of 8 million dollars to the U.S. government.
Embracing 97 computers, including the American Navy and NASA system.
However, embracing, says that he has not made any bad intentions but they were seeking information on natural deeds, which, in his opinion, the U.S. government was kept secret.
Embracing mother Janice said that they are happy with the decision.
Embracing the lawyer said &quot;It is the right decision.
This case is issued with two thousand two and finally has a right decision.
Kashmir: Two Killed Commander
Northern command spokesman, Lieutenant Colonel of the Indian Army deployed in Jammu told BBC: &quot;in haus jungle in Tehsil of Doda district on receiving the reliable information, 24 rifles and men of Jammu and Kashmir police have surrounded the place where the armed extremist was sitting hidden.
He fired on the army and two armed extremist were killed in retaliatory action.
The spokesman said that two militants were killed in 12 years is also restricted active in the district, district commander of Hizbul Mujahideen Zahoor-ud-Din, who was an expert in exploded explosive.
With this, according to the army, which has been identified as Sajjad Hussain had been associated with the extremists from last year.
The army said two Kalashnikov rifles were recovered in the first phase of the operation, according to the rural areas is still continuing operation because the possibility of further extremists presence there.
Yesterday, the province&apos;s police chief Kumar coop issued figures of 8 year, while this year, so far the most peaceful year declared.
No violence was not in the Assembly elections is worth mentioning that in seven phases in November and December.
13 and a half the more than 100 candidates participated in the elections.
It should be noted that the last 18 years is active in Jammu and Kashmir.
The one-sided had announced in July for the first time, after which talks between the government of India and the commanders was.
However, only ended fire within 15 days.
Later, several senior commanders of the opposition were killed in an different.
On Thursday, that was written about Pakistan&apos;s famous daily, the news, extremist groups residing in Kashmir under the Pakistan Army and the decided to review the Kashmir policy.
It should be noted that the policy of both organizations until now was that the Kashmir issue cannot be resolved through armed resistance.
Dera: Explosion on a Gas Pipeline.
According to police officials Monday from the gas field mountains to the 18-inch pipeline from Qatar to the blast.
The pipeline is the direction of the Sui plant.
Meanwhile, yourself, the spokesman of the outlawed organization Baloch Republican army appears to the Baloch, a person from the telephone organization has claimed responsibility for the attack.
In the fourth gas pipeline explosion has been.
On Friday, a 18-inch Qatar pipeline in Dera Allah Yar had been destroyed, of which the repair work was continued till Sunday morning.
Mushtaq Siddiqui, general manager of Sui Southern Gas Company in Quetta said that supply of gas to the pipeline will be started after noon.
The pipeline is being our way of Quetta.
There is a severe shortage of gas from three days in Quetta, Pilgrimage and other areas where the snowfall is continuing and the temperature fell down from the perspective congelation. and, on the other hand, heaters and stoves have had cool.
It also was attacked in a motorcycle in the property market in the city of Dera Bugti, but according to police, the blast is any casualty.
Administrator for Party
The party is in the center, about 25 kilometers from Lahore sheep.
The Hostel of Hospitals, schools and students are also included in the center.
Punjab Law Minister Rana Sanaullah Khan said that the process for the appointment of surveillance in the center of the party have been brought so there welfare work is not affected.
According to Amir Jamaat-e-Hafiz Saeed Walid Khalid, located in the center for the supervision of Hospitals, schools and other social institutions, a senior government official has been appointed as the Emperor Babar administrator and there has been an increase in the number of police in the center.
The UN Security Council has imposed a ban on the party, after which the government of Punjab to appoint center in the federal government of Pakistan to take action against all over the country, and other leaders including party leader Hafiz Saeed has been detained. The party against by the federal government is the continuation of the proceedings.
Emperor Babar belong to D. M. G., District management group.
Hafiz Walid Khalid said that the commissioner Lahore division Khusru Pervez Khan Sunday came along with the police and civil administration in the center and inspected different parts of center Walid Khalid has condemned to appoint administrators in the center of the party on behalf of the government and said that due to the first government operations, located in the center is a reduction in the number of patients in the hospital and school children.
On the other hand, according to a press release of the party, party leader, Hafiz Saeed has written a letter to UN General Secretary arrow silence and committee for Taleban, in which he appealed to the Security Council to end the ban imposed by the party.
It was said in the letter that the Security Council is an injustice by one-sided decision of the ban on Party and Jamaat has no connection with terrorism, but it is busy in welfare work.
On Relief Mission of Edhi Gaza
To obtain the required permission to enter Gaza, after passing through many stages now, he can succeed in coming to Egypt from New York.
Talking to BBC Urdu service from Cairo, he said that he still could not reach Gaza because Egypt and Israel have been parked many obstacles.
He said that I have come here eight days and still was not allowed to go to Gaza.
&quot;I am in Cairo at this time and it is hoped that tomorrow will be received permission to go to Gaza.
While discussing the details, he said: &quot;I was invited only 7 days to go to Gaza first and then in my insistence on the Pakistani authorities to help me and it only one time in a month that this condition but will leave Gaza, single.
He said that their son and daughters are and they want to have the relief work in Gaza.
&quot;I brought some money.
Egypt has given a check of 100,000 dollars to the Red Cross and 10 thousand dollars cash are also given so that they send relief goods in Gaza.
Four More Ministers in Cabinet, Tomorrow
Two Muttahida Qaumi Movement in four new federal ministers and two Jamiat Ulema-e-Islam Fazlur Rehman, are members of the group.
The new Ministers took oath from President Asif Ali Zardari.
Swearing-in ceremony of Prime Minister Yousuf Raza Gilani, members of the federal cabinet also present
With the inclusion of four new ministers in the federal cabinet, Federal Minister, State Minister and the total number of advisors has been.
Two ministers of the MQM are Farooq Sattar and Babar Ghauri and Jamiat Ulema Islam are Prime Swati and Maulana Fazlur Rehman Group Ataur Rehman.
Yet, the departments of these ministers have not announced.
Farooq Sattar are convener of MQM while Babar Ghauri MQM Senator and his period ended on March 10.
As prime Swati independent Senator were elected and it is counted in the richest Senator.
Maulana Ataur Rahman are a member of the National Assembly and the younger brother of Maulana Fazal ur Rehman.
It should be remembered that all four advisers to important posts are not members of the national assembly.
It should be noted that on November 3, two thousand 8 were also included 22 new ministers and 18 ministers of state in the cabinet, this time was being believed that members of the MQM would be included in the cabinet, however, due to differences in the distribution of ministries, MQM had not been included.
Baluchistan, Blew up a Pipeline.
According to the police, 18-inch Qatar is the pipeline which is the Sui Gas plant and different wells of mountains on Monday that unidentified men blew up in the morning.
Besides this, yesterday in Sui well No. 3 was completely destroyed by the explosion and a gas pipeline explosion near Dera Allah Yar was harmful.
The responsibility of the explosions outlawed organization Baloch Republican army spokesman Baloch has accepted on behalf of his organization.
In Balochistan, 9 year two thousand started as the violence has increased.
This month has so far been dozens of gas pipelines from the blasts and attacks on people belonging to the trains and Punjab province has increased.
Balochistan Chief Minister Nawab Aslam, although they have expressed concern over the incidents and the exchange of information with the police and intelligence agencies have been ordered so far, the prevention of these incidents could not be possible.
Economic Aid Package of 56 Billion Dollars Approved
The President, any member has not voted in favor of this project, any belonging to the party.
Members will not be said that this is very economic plan, expensive, and home.
Have been 200 and 100 votes in opposition in favor of this package in the House of Representatives.
The plan of economic rehabilitation next week is to be presented in the Senate, where the government is a little majority Democratic Party.
Concern has been expressed that due to strong opposition from the party, it will not easy approval from the Senate.
After the approval of the plan of economic rehabilitation in the House of Representatives, said while stressing members that they do not allow political differences to obstacles in the path of this important project.
The President said that this project will prove helpful in building a manufacturing environment in the country about which he hoped that next month will take the form of the law which will be to promote trade in US.
Under this plan, two hundred and seventy-five billion dollars in loans out of schools, roads, bridges, 10 thousand and five hundred 40 billion to serve, unemployment for the common men and traders community will be given to the research of new technology.
In Washington, the BBC correspondent Richard has said that the political differences so low, a new political culture was determined to recognizant, but once again the debate on the economic package created bitterness in political basis.
Members of the party in the House of Representatives declared the bill proposed by the government as a waste of money to the government and said that it will not get any help in creating new jobs.
He stressed on the bill proposed by his party which has been given much attention on immunity in.
He said through his package of employment in a more reduced investment more can create.
He said that the construction project to flourish in taxation can create more immediate employment
Bitterness in Israeli President, Turkish Prime Minister
Rajab Tayyeb said about the Israeli President has said that the blood of many people in Gaza and that he was sorry to see that people on the Israeli side, the army can fit on the justification of daily.
Mr. said: &quot;&quot; I think that you are using such words for their guilt problems and perhaps, he raised his voice but you had killed people and I am remembering the children who were killed near the beach.
Perez said that the tragedy of Gaza is not Israel, Hamas, which has been established as a dangerous dictator there.
A BBC correspondent from Davis says that ever before the World Economic Forum, it was not at the scene.
Later, however, said that they do respect the president and his life as a result of which they do not yell at them, but he was saying something that he was far from the truth.
Turkey is their sugarcane grams Muslim countries which have diplomatic relations with Israel, but the last few years is found in tension.
&quot;The Attack Was Not Planned in Pakistan.
Talking to the Indian TV channel, N. D., Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that the Pakistani investigation report of the Mumbai attacks will soon be has issued.
Last November, more than 100 people were killed in the attacks in Mumbai.
India says that responsibility for the attacks is on the extremist group Lashkar-e-.
India has also said that Pakistan, state elements, in Mumbai attacks were involved.
The relations between the two countries after the Mumbai attacks have been affected.
High Commissioner Wajid Shamsul Hasan has given the first statement about the Pakistani investigation from which it can be made in the report of the investigations that consent is identical.
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: &quot;as far as investigations have reached on his car as a result, the soil of Pakistan was not used.
It is also a place is possible, Britain.
I was worried about were the two places (Britain and Pakistan).
India and the international community has made enough pressure on Pakistan to take action against the officials of the Mumbai attacks. Pakistan says it has arrested dozens of people in action against groups allegedly involved in the Mumbai attacks.
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: &quot;We are not try to cast the scene.
We believe in action on the facts.
Our investigation, the world passed.
We will try to satisfy the results (Investigation) and India.
He said while defending the delay in Pakistani investigation, that such material to collect, understand and it takes time to check the testing.
High Commissioner Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that India to present their days were organized.
Leader Elected Black
In the sixth round of elections in the Republican Party, Michael steal the victory obtained by a votes were votes.
In the elections for the post of Party Chairman steal candidate, former chairman Duncan while votes were in the second stage of the competition.
The reporters said that the chairman of the Republican Party as standing for the five candidates were in them, Michael steal the most moderate leader have been recognized.
After winning in his address, Michael steal said &quot;We say with one of his friends and opponents are that you come with us, but the people who will want the gap project, he would be ready to be removed from us. Michael steal from my land is where they have left the deputy governor.
Two thousand six at this time, they got fame when they were standing in the election for a seat in the Senate.
But the Senate defeated in the elections after they were given as a political Committee Chairman of the party.
Now, after being elected Chairman of the party, the efforts of a country-wide campaign of Republican party will be in his head.
He will use new technical to involve the election on the promise that he will give a new cause to the party and conservative party supporters from the party.
Indian Claim of Presence of Jaish-E-Mohammad and Lashkar-E-in Jammu
Militants in Jammu district, are reported to be present.
According to official picture on receiving a secret information, Army and police have surrounded the area and did started.
It started during the clash, in which four militants, two soldiers and one policeman died.
According to the picture, clashes were issued to meet the last report, and in the area, the Jaish-e-Mohammad and Lashkar-e-linked militants have to face further reinforcement of the army has been sent there.
In the meantime, on behalf of the coalition government nominated met Chief Minister Abdullah and his own party, by the national conference, the leader of the assembly informed about intentions to us.
A national conference of the allied party Congress has also support the governor Abdullah.
Omar Abdullah tomorrow will be affirmed oath as the Chief Minister of the state.
It may be recalled that in the recent municipal elections in the house of a national conference members twenty eight get seats and become the biggest party emerged. It should be noted that states parties was the elections.
Congress, which was obtained 17 seats, the coalition government with a national conference to agree.
Today, on a visit to Srinagar, the party welcomed the Omar Abdullah with a warm astrologer.
On this occasion, Omar Abdullah has said that they will play their role to make the talks between the Indian government and the separatists&apos; elements possible but by coming to power of the new government and the holding of elections in India, it will not be possible.
The Role of European Union for Peace in Middle East
Government should be viewed with respect, reconcile efforts to stop the war in the Middle East is decisive in the role of the European Union.
According to the position of the delegation leaves or attempts are equivalent to hand in this work.
European Commission spokesman amadeu altafaj said that all the effort is highly commendable, through which a joint message of the European Union to help the war parties.
The extent of the official statement, all right comes into view.
But in reality, the European Union is presented in an unfortunate picture of civil warp.
The role of the Republic check on the President of the Union is already weak.
Over the internal dispute, it is kept by a bus.
On the other hand, the attitude of the French President, it is like they are still serving the responsibility of the presidency of the European Union.
Although France has complete their term of six months.
Want to play a role, and they can be, but he is not allowed.
The most ridiculous situation facing French foreign minister Bernard kouchner.
They are included in the delegation, led by Foreign Minister of the Republic check schwarzenberg.
There are giving various statements that both foreign ministers about the Middle East war on him.
Schwarzenberg says that Israel has a right to defend yourself when that near this war does not in the category of defense. On the other hand, Germany has also dispatched his Special Ambassador Middle East. As long as the European Union did not show harmony, based on the same position on the diplomatic front, it could not be won.
. The proof is the attitude of Israel, which gives no importance to the reconciliation efforts of Europe.
For the European Union, because this is a golden opportunity to show some time, due to the policies of President George W. Bush has failed in the Middle East.
Financial Crisis: Billion Leaves German Industrialist Suicides.
Living area in Southern Germany, has left a very big business group, his back.
But until a few years ago, a common citizen did not know more about them.
Then, when they give loans to their industrial group, the talks for several weeks with about 30 banks have become the topic of the future of the group is also dark visible.
The group had to bear the loss of several hundred million euros due to the financial crisis after the purchase of the shares of the German maker organization.
Then, the financial institutions to this group, essentially require refused to give new loans worth between 700 million and one billion euros, came under severe pressure.
Some time ago, the bank group were then ready to provide loans on an emergency basis, but that a small industrialist who arrived at the place, the annual income of their industrial group had become about 30 billion euros, their capitalism power could not bear the deprivation.
The death of his father when his family business kept raised on 33, while it has also developed very soon.
He has kept the name of his company ratiopharm that today is very successful and very large drug manufacturing company of Germany.
Until a few years ago, the drug Agency&apos;s business was worth between 5 and 6 billion euros, and it still is the income of 1. 8 billion euros annually. The tremendous success of the form to buy several large institutions after the group, which also includes the Royal company to prepare the vehicle from the cement for construction equipment like.
Group all over the world, the number of employees is about 100,000, and medicine manufacturing company named in the assets of this form is always obtained special importance.
In his life, it was said many times: &quot;We have four generations while pharmacy.
Now, the department has arranged with my children, and I hope that this organization for just a few hundred years, I will be in the same family.
After the suicide of banks has given approval of interim loans worth 400 million euros for his group vem, but the condition is that vem will pass on the form, so that the financial condition of the group can be improved on a long term basis.
Thus, after the death of the group, he will not that he was ever.
Rate of Crime in Foreign People in Germany
The crime rate of foreigners between 2004 to 2007, according to a recent statistic, 22.
21 by less than 9 percent.
Has been raised to 4 percent.
According to the State Minister herrmann, it is only a formal positive change.
He said: &quot;It is essential to be kept mind that the number of foreigners who obtained German citizenship is increasing.
Therefore, it should be explained in statistics to commit that crime, although the German citizens, but it is a foreign background.
Herrmann said that his province to collect data about the criminals from now, it will be a factor.
Besides, the province is also thought on these lines.
Cdu belonging of home affairs Senator christoph ahlhaus said: &quot;in a scientific way, when research is human beings cannot already prepared their own results, but it depends on these figures is come after the research.
Ahlhaus in bergdorf part of the city, according to a report by the fact that attention was prepared in 2006 and that of the Provincial Anti-crime office discovered it was anticipated that the participation of foreigners in the crime here how many percent.
The results found that foreigners here
The crime rate is low in comparison with the crime in all provinces.
In contrast, when the rate of crime in youth during 2006 in Berlin were reviewed, it emerged that the ratio of the youth to foreign background 44.
7 percent.
However, other political parties of Germany, for example, spd, Environment worshipers left the party-linkspartei crime that is against this proposal, together with the relevant statistics, that time should be collected this information, what is foreign background of German citizens.
Want a Quick Withdrawal of Forces from Gaza:
The importance of the agreement for a permanent and lasting ceasefire for the complete withdrawal of forces is unavoidable.
Hamas and Israel has announced a ceasefire on Sunday.
Announcing the ceasefire of one week, the Islamic militant group Hamas said that detention should be left completely within the Israeli forces from the Gaza Strip within a week and sealing off the Gaza Strip should be abolished.
On the other hand, Hamas leader Ismail has said that the war in Gaza, Israel has been possessed by the God.
He said that the war in Gaza, Israel has failed to achieve their goals.
Earlier, the Egyptian city of shame in Al-Shaikh, on Sunday, a meeting of the leaders of the European and Arab countries was held, which was demanding immediate withdrawal of Israeli forces from Gaza.
It was agreed in the meeting that soon will be held an international donor conference for Gaza.
The German Chancellor also participated in the meeting.
Israel and Hamas continued for three weeks tomorrow, 13 Israeli, including at least 13 100 Palestinians and 10 soldiers were killed in the war.
On the other hand, Palestinian President Abbas stressed the United National government building in Palestinian areas.
Name of Germany Video Message of Al-Qaeda
A person in the video of 30 minutes, wearing black color palm, mouth, holding a gun in his hand and is giving a message to the German government.
The person himself has introduced by the name of Abu Talha and is talking in the German language.
Arabic, all of this video message are also present.
The screen has been attached to see, and video is registered in the history of October 2008.
In this message, the German government has said that such a large number troops in Afghanistan has been appointed by the country expressed the belief that it will not attack, it is not easy charity, and what?
Although the man who tell themselves independently on Germany has not threatened the attacks.
In Afghanistan, the number of German soldiers involved in the NATO allied forces is approximately 3,500.
In October last year, the German parliament has also approved the law of 1000 more troops to Afghanistan.
The accord is the first message from Germany.
Scare on terrorism related issues in connection with this message to the renowned expert, says: &quot;The suicide attack outside the German embassy in Kabul recently, it is proof that we take it seriously in every condition.
Over the last few years is continuing the video messages on the Internet and such messages were also after the attack.
On Saturday, the responsibility of the suicide attack outside the German embassy in Kabul has taken the Taliban Military organization.
Most German newspapers and observers are watching a transition to a message to the attack.
&quot;They are targeting Germany.
Fundamentalist Muslims, Germany are looking to be negative to the Afghan policy.
The German government accuses of adopt policy not only in Afghanistan but the Middle East.
And this reason, they are more, Germany as its target.
Meanwhile, the German government has said that the German intelligence agencies before coming to publicize the video was aware about it.
The German Federal Anti-crime organization is engaged in investigating the video message.
American Taken Post of President.
In this background, the American people, on one hand, the world has been associated with different expectations.
Now, while are received messages of congratulations from all over to become the president of the United States, they are come from any expectations.
In this regard, the German Chancellor has expressed confidence on the new US President.
&quot;I believe it, the Federal Republic on the basis of a deep friendship and partnership between Germany and the United States like the state, we can solve the problems.
Russian Prime Minister Mir Putin says that are shown on the owner of a serious and open heart and this is a good thing.
However, former U.S. President George W. Bush is facing criticism of the policies.
However, it is certainly good for the administration to give the movement to play more constructive role at the international level to China while China about the new US President has said that he would have to work for a strong military ties between the two countries.
German city active in Chinese politics expert says:
&quot;in this perspective, I believe that in the coming weeks and months and his economic team will lay down the tremendous pressure and the Beijing government will be forced to adopt a better and market relevance to the exchange rate for the Chinese currency.
Former American administration has made further relations with India.
Where these relations could, a professor of American Studies in New Delhi about this rule says: &quot;Now we have come near the strategic partnership between more but one night, could not bring any change.
In his message, the Pope stressed on promotion to the atmosphere of peace and cooperation in the world.
Provincial Elections in Iraq
After a year, this is the first important elections in the war-stricken country.
In provincial elections for 14, 500 have landed in.
To maintain law and order situation during the elections, 8 thousand police and soldiers have been deployed in Iraq.
In view of this danger, all the borders of Iraq that such important day would not attack scare any explosives or any other means only a day ago Cell had been on Friday.
Besides, the airport closed and have stressed and has imposed a ban on public transport.
According to reports, due to a ban on transport, are not in the traffic on the roads, and Iraqi children have been seen playing football on the streets.
During the recent Iraqi elections, the security situation, on one hand, it will be the idea that in the year after the withdrawal of American forces from Iraq, local agencies will find the reigns of the country or not, on the other hand, political analyst it are also taken as an experience, which estimated that the Iraqi people are ready to what extent democratic way to bring a change in the country.
The provincial elections are being conducted in support of the United Nations and about 8 100 international observers are to review the electoral process.
Throughout Day Today in Iran, Day Was Celebrated with Respect and Honor Memory of a Great Sacrifice of Hazrat Imam Hussain (25)
On this occasion, the meetings organized and participated in large numbers in Nabi Mukarram () and their (25), Iran meet today presented his condolences to the adaptation of the martyrdom of Imam Hussein (25), son of Prophet Mohammad Akram () to participate in the meetings of the fresh memory of sacrifice is behind this example in the field of Karbala of Hazrat Imam Hussain (25) and Azadar in remembrance of giant sacrifice in the field of Karbala and on a large scale and, according to the Mehr news agency report in all small and big cities including Tehran, the capital of Iran, Syed Hazrat Imam Hussain (25) was celebrated with great respect and reverence.
The Retreat of Israeli Troops from Gaza Area. The Example of Palestinian Mujahideen Perseverance
According to the Mehr News Agency Urdu service right battle in Gaza City population by day, Israel continued bombing in Israel&apos;s air, ground and sea attacks on Gaza, Palestinian until now, people were killed and injured.
They included 275 innocent PM who called treachery of Arab leaders and international human rights organizations are in the embrace of his death.
The funeral of Gaza today were Israeli soldiers from the area have been forced to America and Israel are showing great firmness and loyalty and support the power of faith and martyrdom are harassing rhyme life on the enemy
If the Egyptian President Hosny sinister is not treason, Hamas and Israel Bahadur Mujahid when away from defeat, four have been but also Egyptian Muslim Palestinians with Israeli siege is helping philosopher who is the most terrible incident of Arab history
On the other hand, the governments of Saudi Arabia and Jordan are to provide political and economic assistance to Israel and Gaza giving with treachery with the unarmed Muslims and Israel.
The United States Will Adopt a New Strategy with Iran
According to the report of the Mehr news agency, elected President of the United States, speaking with a B C news channel said that they will adopt a new and modern strategy on the issue of Iran.
Iran will be a very big challenges for the American government, &quot;said.
Said that Iranian and support of the Islamic Organization Hamas and Hezbollah is worried about Iran&apos;s nuclear program.
But they will not be issued to US President George W. Bush&apos;s policy on Iran and the relations with Iran will adopt a different policy in this regard.
Said that he will emphasize on the desire of their real purpose completely clear, mutual respect and dialogue.
In the past, have also said that talks with Iran should not be imposed any conditions before in this regard.
During the interview, he hoped that the administration will be working with the new strategy, speed with regard to Iran.
About the Middle East crisis, said that they are shaping a special team in this regard.
Start work after January 20 for peace efforts in the middle.
Bush Incompetent and American President Bush Has Acknowledged Its Mistakes in Last Press Conference.
Regarding the Mehr news agency Associated Press, has noted that US President George W. Bush has acknowledged several of its mistakes and crimes in the final press conference of his term.
Addressing a press conference at the White House, President Bush said that they have feelings of goodwill toward the newly elected President, but for most it to possible attacks on the United States.
He said that the completion of the mission in Iraq and social security reforms were their mistakes.
President Bush has said that he made that some 100 for the protection of the United States.
In response to several questions were asked about the ongoing Israeli aggression in Gaza, President Bush said that Israel has a right to defend yourself, according to them, Hamas is not a right to defend himself and the world like Hamas should not raise their hands on Israel and the United States should flatten the neck of the victim instead of cruelty
Inefficient and ineffective, President of the United States said that Hamas weapons should not be provided the United States and Israel are providing the world&apos;s most deadly and devastating weapons of Palestinians are being massacred in Israel to benefit from American weapons, Bush praised the pro-Israel Arabs and termed Israel&apos;s friend.
Bush expressed embarrassment at some of the crimes in Abu Ghraib and jails.
Observers say Bush should set up a war crimes case and organizations who will perform this work will be a favor on their humanity.
President Ahmadinejad, Iranian President Expressed His Regret over Silence of Leaders of Arab Countries.
Mehr news agency reported that Iranian President Dr. Ahmadinejad has been expecting criticism on the Israeli aggression on Gaza and the oppression of the rest of the leaders expressed regret.
Since he has said that Israel is Palestinian people lettuce is targeting its savagery to Palestinian children, women and civilians and Arab has even not issued a statement, expressing surprise at the silence on the barbaric action of the Arab countries and Israel on his head from Gaza.
President Ahmadinejad is that all the Arab countries against Israel unite Shar and the oppression of Israel to the oppressed Muslims of Gaza and the country.
Ahmadi, King of Saudi Arabia Should Clarify Its Position in Human Genocide by Israel in Gaza
According to the report of the Mehr news agency, President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, the ruler of Saudi Arabia, the name of the country, Abdullah said in his message that the Muslim king of Saudi Arabia has been silence on the common cause of Islam encourage children rest on human genocide in the Gaza strip and the killing of innocent children and women in Gaza
President Ahmadinejad said in the message that you can failed their efforts by differences in front of enemies so their right position on Gaza and the support of the oppressed and clear.
President Ahmadinejad said in his message that you know is that within 19 days, Israel has been balance on human genocide in Gaza killing innocent innocent children are common in Gaza, the Israeli Government is badly massacred in these circumstances, the silence of leaders like you are raised the morale of Israel is a barbaric bombardment on houses, mosques, schools and hospitals.
President Ahmadinejad from the country, Abdullah said that non-Islamic countries like Venezuela and have taken concrete steps against Israel, you can expect from these countries.
President Ahmadinejad will got step of the Palestinians in the Gaza strip.
Ascendant -- on the cruelty victory will be possible, and this is the promise of God.
President George Bush Terrorism Is Still a Threat to United States.
Mehr news agency quoting the German news agency, has noted that U.S. President George W. Bush addressing the nation and his successor in his farewell speech, said that even though seven years earlier than the United States is safe today, but the danger of terrorism is still us, Sir.
Bush said that the United States attacked to terrorist enemies are sitting establish vine with patience and he intended determined to attack the United States and the United States should also be oblivious to its security.
The American President of hundreds of thousands of Palestinians in the Gaza Strip, grief and will defend its aggressive and wrong policies while these statements do not accept the fact that the president of the United States, the United States is still the biggest supporter of freedom, although observers of the American president George Bush like Israel are not only the government, but is directly involved in this crime, not because the United States, which is a symbol of independence and not only is the champion of human rights, but the United States is the most evil country in the world.
Israel, children, women and civilians have been massacred, and by the president of the United States, there is saying that American humanity and freedom in the world, and other places of the world is.
Osama Will Continue in Palestine
According to the report of the Mehr news agency, Hamas representative in Lebanon, Osama, speaking with the French news agency, said that one-sided ceasefire by Israel is against the efforts of the international comprehensive ceasefire, he said until the present in Gaza will continue until this time, on one hand, the cease-fire will be meaningless
He said that on one hand, the ceasefire is Israel&apos;s failed attempt to avoid defeat, said that if Israel wants the continual peace that it to end with Hamas to accept the conditions
Hamas leader in Lebanon made it clear that the rest of the Israeli army in the Gaza strip live in the one-sided ceasefire if Israel will continue resistance against it.
Addressing a conference in Beirut in solidarity with his Gaza Osama has demanded severed relations with Israel with European countries.
Hamas leader said that the increasing number of martyrs and injured was Our determination and courage, and the number will be raised.
On the Palestinian people, he said that a rock in the war against the enemy continue resistance.
In Pakistan&apos;s Tribal Region of North Waziristan, Taliban Killed Six People.
Quoting Reuters, the Mehr News Agency has noted that four Pakistanis and two Afghan civilians in Pakistan&apos;s tribal region of North Waziristan sounded murdered in the Taliban accused of spying.
According to reports, local people were killed Tuesday morning upon are four corpses in Tehsil Chowk area of the district.
While two bodies are received from the location, the market had been shot in a market.
It has been claimed that the spy used letters were written in Urdu are also met with dead bodies.
Two weeks ago, two Afghan nationals in North Waziristan, the location was murdered in the charges of espionage.
In the last 12 days, 15 people have been killed in the charge of spying for the United States.
It should be noted that during the six years in South and North Waziristan, more than 100 people have been killed in the charges of espionage on Taliban is that they are involved in this kind of murder cases.
Expected Signed Order of Notorious Jail Term to Be Closed
Mehr news agency quoting the sources noted that the American president today signed the order of the notorious jail term to be closed.
New American President Hussein has started to import a level on the promises of his election campaign.
In this connection, the President has instructed to make plans for the withdrawal of American forces from Iraq, and the order of today to stop the notorious jail term of American President will be signed.
It is expected that the president are going to sign today as the order under which will be closed within cell within a year.
In addition to the White House, the methods of investigating suspected terrorists is likely to be issued orders to ban bad words to revise and prisoners.
President has started work on the first day of his presidency to fulfill the promises of the election and was first taken to make transparent the process and achievement of his government.
Observers say that the American President of the United States on the international level fall also started efforts to protect the reputation. But they are very difficult to get this success because as long as the United States supported Israel&apos;s savage government is firm on middle till then it did not expect any good work is possible if the United States wants to save its reputation in the world, then it should be helped to Israel&apos;s and should not be involved in this crime.
Tony Blair Islamic Organization Hamas Stressed Need to Be Included in Talks
With regard to the Mehr news agency, British newspaper The Times, has noted that British Prime Minister Tony Blair has stressed the need to include Hamas in the Middle East peace process.
According to the newspaper, Tony Blair said that it is important that a way should be found through which Hamas should be brought to the Middle East peace process on the Bush only to talk with Mahmoud Abbas, and Hamas of severe criticism for ignoring the public and Nizami power of Hamas steam, it should be noted that the Western countries and now they are talking to participate in the talks and struggle and struggle is that the thief at home and country like Israel has kept seized from 60 years before he was talking interpretation from a terrorist organization Hamas a terrorist organization, who is the defence of their country, to hold free from the occupation of their homes and others.
Complete Strike in Baluchistan Traders Murder in Karachi, Quetta
Complete Strike in Balochistan in Karachi, Quetta Thursday against the killing of four businessmen and some other areas.
During this period, all the business centers remained closed while the traffic was less than usual.
The appeal of the protest strike was Baluchistan, Association of the National Awami Party and Jamiat-e-Ulema-e-Islam, who alleged that these traders from the alleged shooting, Karachi Police were killed when he reached the showroom of their vehicles on Tariq Road in his car.
President Abdul Rahman Kakar Association has demanded that action should be taken against those involved in the incident, the police arrested the family cars.
The stand of the Karachi police immediately about the incident, however, was not front.
Four traders who were killed was connected to the frontier city garden.
On the occasion of the strike, security arrangements were made on a large scale on behalf of the government and police officials were deployed at important places throughout the city.
Israeli Attack Killed a Senior Commander of Hamas.
In an attack of Israel, a senior commander of Hamas died.
This is the death of other important personality of Hamas in attacks on Israel in the Gaza strip a week.
Hamas officials said that Abu killed in localities situated in the east of Gaza City on Saturday.
Hamas Alam were killed on Thursday in another attack of Israel.
Exile leader of Hamas, Khalid torch residing in Syria vowed to take revenge and warned Israel against ground attack on Gaza.
Thousands of Israeli soldiers and tanks are deployed on the border of Gaza and they are waiting for the orders of daily army.
The United States has appealed for ceasefire. But said that the decision to daily army on Gaza or not depends on Israel.
US President George W. Bush has declared in his weekly speech on radio, accused Hamas of incitement to violence and terrorism to the rocket attacks on Israel.
He said that the United States is doing work for a ceasefire, but a bilateral deal will not be acceptable.
Three Corpses Recovered in North Waziristan.
Pakistani security officials said that the corpses of three men in the North Waziristan tribal region.
Suspicion is that they killed the Taliban for the death sentence.
The dead bodies were found near the central city of North Waziristan Miranshah. And they are met with such letters, in which these men have been accused of spying for the United States.
The officials said that a body part in them is the local man who was kidnapped last week.
He said that the strategy to bullets are two bodies of Afghan people.
In Gaza, Israeli Attack on Tenth Day Issued
The Palestinian boy injured in Israeli missile strikes are bad forces of Israel against Hamas in the whole area of the Gaza Strip, while the Israeli air force has continuously continue attacks on suspected hideouts of militant elements in 10th.
In the bar, the Defense Minister said on Monday that the military will continue till the time, until the people of Southern Israel would be not safe from attacks by Hamas.
However, the firing of rockets from Hamas is continuing despite Israel&apos;s attacks which killed four people including three civilians in Israel.
Hamas leader Mahmoud Department has stressed on his colleagues on Monday that they will ruin the Israeli forces and to make common Israeli citizens target.
But a Hamas official has said that his organization to consider the latest situation of the violence on Monday decided to send a delegation to Egypt them.
In Gaza, a Palestinian injured woman in Gaza, medical sources said that in the past 10 days, people have being killed, and they included the civilians killed on Monday, in which at least five children were.
Israel has reported the death and injuries of a soldier in the ground attack.
As the news of the Israeli army, with the purpose, foreign journalists have been stopped from entering the Gaza strip.
Elected U.S. Vice President Joseph Reach Pakistan.
The Minister welcomed U.S. Vice President elected
Elected Vice President of the United States, Joseph has arrived in Islamabad on Friday with his delegation on a visit to Pakistan.
The Minister Shah Mahmood Qureshi and U.S. embassy officials welcomed them.
Are with us in this visit.
American embassy&apos;s press officer lo told Voice of America that the newly elected President will hold talks with Pakistani leadership during his visit on various regional issues, but he did not give further details.
According to the sources of the foreign office, Joseph will also meet the head of the army general Ashfaq Pervez on besides senior government officials.
It is expected that these meetings will exchange views on important bilateral and international issues in matters relating to the war against terrorism.
Joseph was ruling Pakistan Crescent
After reaching Islamabad, Joseph met with President Asif Ali Zardari.
The president in a meeting on his role in establishing closer ties between Pakistan and the United States, Pakistan Crescent honor the ruling.
It should be noted that Joseph had introduced a bill along with US Senator as the Chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee last year, in which 7 million dollars has been recommended by increasing three times in military aid of the United States during the next five years for Pakistan.
The Former President Pervez Musharraf, Uniform, Will Play an Important Role in First, Prime Minister
Yusuf Raza Gilani and who (file PHOTO
Prime Minister Yousuf Raza Gilani said that elected Vice President of the United States, which has been playing an important role in former President Pervez Musharraf&apos;s uniform, to leave the post of the head of the army, and the substantial support for democracy in Pakistan&apos;s
. Yusuf Raza Gilani has made this statement while talking to journalists on the Karachi Ship.
He said that the &quot;pro-Pakistan&quot; or are pro-Pakistan leader and he has presented a bill to the aid of dollars for Pakistan as the Chairman of the foreign affairs committee of the U.S. Senate.
The missile attacks to be US spy planes in Pakistani territory once again to allow the Prime Minister of Pakistan said such attacks were condemned such attacks in national territory, so he could not give any permission is not any kind of agreement with the US government and the MQM on them is a matter of the independence of Pakistan
He also expressed the hope that the United States will be a change in the policy of the United States after coming to power of the new government.
(file photo)
Yusuf Raza Gilani said that the government has very successfully separate from the common people to the terrorists, but he made from planes to terrorist and tribes are proved to be harmful for government efforts have received the missile attack.
He said that the international community will agree to the stand of Pakistan.
The Prime Minister further said that if no reliable evidence should be given, Pakistani forces will taken in their own areas.
Mumbai attacks on Prime Minister Yousuf Raza Gilani said in its stand that if India should provide evidences, it will be investigated on the basis and be proof of involvement, against this country would be taken according to the law.
Rahman from Britain tour of the country and the MQM leader Altaf Hussain, in response to a question about the meeting, the prime minister said his country Rehman were allowed to London.
Quetta, DSP and Four Policemen Killed
File PHOTO
An important road of Quetta on seryaab road, a DSP, Deputy Police from firing by unknown persons, including four policemen, were killed.
On Wednesday morning, two DSP riding in a jeep, a sub-inspector and two constables were going to the police training center, located on the road that seryaab unknown attackers riding on a motorcycle near the Degree College started firing on the police jeep from which Mehdi sub inspector and a constable Allah died on the spot while a DSP Hasan Ali died after reaching hospital.
Hospital sources said that severely injured the other DSP Ghulam condition is critical and they are struck shot in the head and neck.
After this incident, the police surrounded the area to date, the responsibility of the incident, no one has accepted.
A U.S. and Indian Software Engineer&apos;s Killing
In the United States, Andhra Pradesh belonging a and software shot and killed by unknown attackers.
Living in two days ago died during medical treatment in hospital. The unknown attackers shot in the state.
He was a servant of computers and was serving as a jet Airways in the United States.
In the past one year, belonging to the Andhra Pradesh, seven students have been killed at the hands of anti-social elements in the United States.
To obtain higher education and employment in the United States, the students to the increasing casualties in the province has created concern in their thousands of families whose children are living in the United States.
It should be noted that priority is being given to the United States in Andhra Pradesh for higher education and a better future.
According to the statistics of the American Consulate in Chennai, South India receive 100,000 every year for us visas are most, 40 percent are from Andhra Pradesh.
Meanwhile, the provincial government has begun efforts to bring the body of the deceased to Hyderabad.
The United States to Remain Vigilant Against Enemy Attacks: Bush
President George W. Bush, in his last weekly speech, the United States has stressed that he remained vigilant against enemy attacks.
Mr. Bush said that for the Americans, so far the biggest danger is the possibility of a terrorist attack. and he warned that the enemies of the country are waiting with patience and they were under attack again.
Fast, shoulder, the President said the United Statesrecently should never be absent from their safety.
President Bush expressed best wishes for the next President Barak, who will take his post on Tuesday.
The newly elected President, Barak has looked light on the historical importance of the ceremony of swearing in his speech on Saturday Radio on behalf of the Democratic Party.
He said that the ceremony is a practice that a leader is a very deep connection with American greatness of peaceful transfer of power from the other leaders.
Mr. reminded that all over the world, many people could not even this concept that their leaders will be helped to power without resident or struggle.
In Raiwind Sharif Brothers and a Meeting of Federal Interior Minister, Exchanged Views on Political and Security Affairs
The opposition in the biggest and Punjab Chief Minister of Punjab, Shahbaz Sharif in which was meeting in Raiwind on Sunday between the head of the ruling party, Pakistan Muslim League (N) Nawaz Sharif and Federal Interior Minister Rehman Malik was also present.
According to local media, Rehman Malik was brought any important message to the leadership of the Pakistan People&apos;s Party as possible.
However, talking to journalists after the meeting, a country in this regard did not reveal any detail and only said that with regard to political affairs, he spoke of the politics of consensus, and the leadership of P. M. L. N is briefed on the situation after the Mumbai attacks.
In his words: &quot;so far, all the action has provided information about it.
Not that there has been a large operation in Punjab and the Punjab government and is still need the help of the Punjab government, which has set up a team.
Rehman Malik said that the media, then, are not reported every day, but the leadership of P. M. L. N is daily exchange. On the other hand, the spokesman of the Pakistan Muslim League (N), Pervaiz Rashid avoided disclosing anything about political issues in the talks, and so has said that he was the person who tell a country telling.
It should be noted that a meeting of the Interior advisor to the leadership of the Pakistan Muslim League (N) has been this time when that government in the summer, warm politics province belonging to the Punjab anti P. M. L. Q more than a press conference with the administrators, Punjab Governor Salman P. M. L. N, rejecting criticism of the actions of the provincial government by managers belonging to the Pakistan Peoples Party, the Punjab Governor object on the participation in this matter.
Speech Is Pleasing for Pakistan: President Zardari.
It is fortunate for the people of Pakistan and that Pakistani President Asif Ali Zardari, welcoming the opening address of the new president of the United States said that his side to advance the relationship of mutual respect and interests with the Muslim world.
In a statement released on Wednesday, he said that the high principles and values from the American president reiterating the determination of the people of the world, is the hope of a better future.
According to the statement, President Zardari said that with the help of the international community, America is undoubtedly put the important responsibility of finding a new way of peace and development in the 21st century and happy.
It should be noted that the president had said in the opening address after taking oath on Tuesday that the United States wants the new progress with the Muslim world, which is based on mutual interests and mutual respect.
He assured the people of poor countries was that the United States should work together with them so that there is a social development and to reduce poverty.
The President Has Appointed a Special Representative for Afghanistan and Pakistan.
Richard Hall, former Hall for the United Nations, has been appointed as special for Pakistan and Afghanistan.
The hall has played an important role to the peace agreement in Bosnia.
Hall said that they are ready to advise the President on matters of Afghanistan and Pakistan.
He said that it is not an easy task.
He said that the history of the two countries is very different.
For the Middle East, George will try to cast John in the Arab-Israeli peace talks have been elected.
Former Senator, and he has played a role in to establish peace in Northern Ireland.
Today, speaking at the State Department, said that the situation of the Middle East is very complicated and unstable and dangerous.
But despite this, the United States will never back out from their peace efforts.
Afghanistan: a Voter Registration in Danger.
Afghanistan&apos;s election commission has said that he has been delay in voter registration in some areas of the South due to concerns about security.
In southern Afghanistan, near, voter registration for the presidential election was earlier this week.
But the Commission has said that until the security situation will not be improved, a voter in some areas of Halmand province could not hold register themselves.
Increase in violence from last year in the areas of the South, where Taliban rebels have increased their attacks on Afghan troops and international forces are given.
Meanwhile, the Afghan army and international forces has said that he killed at least during clashes between Wednesday and Thursday night in two lines of Afghanistan.
NATO has said that the army has killed 22 militants in and ground attacks in eastern Khost province near the Pakistan border.
Prior to this, the Afghan defense ministry said that in this province, the Afghan army to eight rebels were killed and two injured.
It is not clear whether the Afghan officials has quoted this incident.
Two Missile Attacks, at Least 18 People Killed in Waziristan
Pakistani intelligence officials said that at least 18 people have been killed in two alleged U.S. missile attacks in North Waziristan.
According to officials, without American planes, three missiles on a house near Mir Ali town of North Waziristan resulted, in which 10 people were killed in the house.
According to local officials, those killed were five foreigners in the war.
This area is considered a stronghold of the Taliban and Al-Qaeda war lice.
Was a missile attack on South Waziristan some&apos; after the incident, in which at least eight people were killed.
After the middle of last year despite the objections, the Pakistani government has been attacked by a missile near 30 in Pakistan now.
Recent attacks in the United States are the first attack after coming to power of the President.
The Bush administration had been to denying them or to claimed responsibility for the attacks.
In Pakistan&apos;s tribal region of North Waziristan on Friday in a suspected American planes resulted three missiles were in which five persons have yet
Those killed could not be identified.
According to initial reports, the missile attack on a house in the area of Mir Ali were.
Is believed that the first missile attack in Pakistan&apos;s tribal region after becoming the president of the
The Frontier Province Government Has Rejected Demand of Ban on Girls&apos; Education in Swat
Frontier Province officials have threatened to impose a ban on girls&apos; education by Taliban fighters in Swat is rejected by saying that &quot;this announcement is against both the law and Islam.
The Education Minister of the Frontier Province on Sunday, Sardar Hussain Babar further said that the government revive such efforts will not be successful.
He said that the efforts of the extremists is that children in our region will be deprived of education.
In his words: &quot;these people could blow up security schools and children are trying to.
While mentioning the atmosphere of fear and uneasiness, he said that the provincial government wants to be catastrophic, well aware that any power could not stop the promotion of education from the soil of Pakhtoons.
One day earlier, under the leadership of Maulana Fazal God, Taliban fighters had demanded to assess the ban on girls&apos; education in educational institutions of Swat and threatened that institutions to violation will be destroyed.
During the last 15 years despite the ongoing military action in Swat educational institutions around the militants destroyed explosives area.
As a result of the educational institutions to be destroyed, thousands of girls and boys have been deprived of education facility.
Strict Security Measures on Occasion of Republic Day in India
Sixtieth Republic Day is being celebrated on Monday in India, thousands of soldiers have been posted in every occasion, strict security measures and the country.
The occasion of the Republic Day is the exhibition of weapons, aircraft, and other military equipment during a military parade in New Delhi.
Officials say that under the security arrangements, anti aircraft battery, &quot;&quot; also have been appointed, and keeping a link on the routes of the parade, the American president congratulated India on this occasion.
Prime Minister Manmohan Singh, who had a heart operation on Saturday, the message of the desire of the quick recovery.
The idea is that yesterday the Indian police had claimed to kill two suspected Pakistani militants after fighting on the outskirts of New Delhi.
According to local officials, the police have also recovered AK 47 rifles, a grenade and some papers from these two people who do this obvious that both are Pakistani.
The police investigation is that both what is concerned with the outlawed organization Lashkar-e-Pakistan, which was involved in the Mumbai attacks in November last year.
Tea: Effective Treatment of Breast Cancer.
In a new research, it has been said that three cup of tea daily
The risk of breast cancer is less than a third in less than 50 years old women from drinking.
In the American state of Florida cancer center in this research, it has been said that less than 50 years of age in such women breast cancer tumor
In at least three cup of tea is to be reduced to 37 percent.
In research, it was also revealed that a large group of women from three or more cup of tea daily drinking is not a particular advantage in this regard.
Experts believe that because of this type of tea in the presence of such factor is that these particular types of cancer are more effective against becomes less than 50 years old women generally.
Cancer center set up in the city of Florida state was the research on more than 5,000 women who had got the treatment of breast cancer.
They were between 20 and 74 years.
The experts were safe from the breast cancer by such women compare their medical records and career.
The experts, it has also found that a particular type of cancer, has prominently, tea and this decreases by 66 percent.
Breast cancer almost every tenth patient is suffering from this kind.
This type of cancer is more dangerous because he is in depth, and it is not known at this time, usually when he has enough spread.
Experts say that regularly daily minimum 3 cup of tea minimum drinking age can reduce the risk of breast cancer in women as outstanding
They say that tea to be included in their daily routines as a daily beverage will create appropriate against cancer in the body.
Every year, about 40 thousand women in Britain is the assessment of the breast cancer.
The War in Afghanistan Is Biggest Military Challenge Facing United States.
American defense minister Robert has said that the war in Afghanistan is the biggest military challenge facing the United States.
Today, members of the US Senate and House of Representatives was giving a briefing about the strategy of the administration on the war in Afghanistan and Iraq.
Told the Senate Armed Services Committee that only, war is not a solution to the problem of Afghanistan, but he added that troops are not available in sufficient numbers to make many areas safe, they take advantage of which the Taliban action.
Reduction in Exercise with Age, Why?
New Research
Exercise is good for Health in every age.
It is used to help your heart form strong, to stop the decline in the level of cholesterol regard, less weight Assistant is proved, diabetes and silence does slow.
Unfortunately, many people is the reduction in the ability to exercise with the increase in age.
Experts say that exercise can affect our body and mind, accurate, but this age.
The American Medical Association say that exercise not to be presented to many health problems.
@ clinic, Dr. pay of cudgel says an increase in age is a major cause of lack of exercise and physical performance.
Dr. teaches medicine in a clinic.
He has made a large age in connection with the ability to exercise of heart diseases and human being of the leadership of a study.
The team of doctors did use high Ahmad of voice to review the performance of the heart.
In which the heart to pump blood, the process of its closeness to the rest of the study.
The experts will concentrate their attention on the left side of the heart, which is a central part to pump blood.
They found that age is increased with the rest of the heart to increase Editorial in the process.
Dr. says with the rest of the heart defects in the process becomes outstanding, and its impact on the ability to exercise with the increase in age is growing.
Dr. keen were included in the study.
They say that we see was that this thing is compulsory and effective and it was clarified that the bad performance of exercise can be much concerned with the process of the rest of the heart.
Sometimes, the blood pressure is causing diseases of the Editorial in the process of heart.
If patients and doctors should work together with regard to the evil effects of the heart, despite the increased age, they can also get the benefits of exercise.
In this regard, the report has been published in the magazine of the American Medical Association.
No Possibility of Immediate War with Pakistan: Indian Army Chief
Indian bad says that the possibility of immediate war with Pakistan is ready to present, but all the time for giving sacrifices to defend the country and to ensure the protection of the interests of the army chief General burner camphor.
General camphor has alleged that assurances and active in the Mumbai attacks, despite international pressure on Pakistan, in his words, not only is there as well, but the structure of terrorism on Pakistani soil.
He said this while talking to reporters in Srinagar.
The head of the Indian land army was on a one-day visit to Kashmir valley of New Delhi to review the overall security situation and preparation of the armed forces on the borders of Kashmir.
The question was asked that According to media reports about the Mumbai attacks, Pakistan has rejected the evidence presented by India, and it is the comment about them.
General camphor said that the decision of the issues of war and peace to be political leadership.
Allegedly, while mentioning the presence of the infrastructure of terrorism on Pakistani soil, he said that the Indian Army will be competing with the elements to destroy the peace dirham and were down on India to be weak.
He said that on the soil of Indian Kashmir, militant to seven to eight hundred have to about 50 percent are foreign.
General burner camphor said that along with the improvement in the weather in the efforts of infiltration from Pakistan and Pakistan-administered Kashmir, there may be, however, India has increased vigilance at the borders.
He said the possibility of reducing the number of troops deployed in Indian-administered Kashmir were overlooked that no compromise can be made with the security of the country.
May God congratulated the language of the world and are to be congratulated for the world.
Though hoped, how much this change in the relations between Pakistan and America is not then are also change direction are in our favor.
That Mr. Martin King who are the dreams of the world...
Part of the name is also Hussein, bear the oath as president today where in every way, as is is also a bitter test at
Not only their own hands, but all those people who have a heart attack.
It will be held, the majority for him to the heart of his government, a color is not an easy task.
To that, he was elected President of America. and to keep South Asia are set, the young President that America is the president of practical.
Now, after some brothers closed slavery as a racial such person at his own mother country were brought from America and remove the blood of the most powerful state in today is a victim of racial discrimination, a representative of the nation, the President of America.
From this one, many people will involve many expectations.
Those who love it is necessary that this person should not force.
If successful to reduce as a hate. On race, religion in the world, it will be for those who love it.
This will change filled in Asia and a meaningful change in this policy could be expected.
On relations between Pakistan and the United States, this change will be.
(Bibi)
And Mr. man, or someone, contested for the entire world and relations of their, trillion bo, influential, strong and capable of influence is not only lobby.
And as far as Pakistan is concerned, in the wake of the Mumbai blasts, India, Israel and America signed the triangle in front of the whole world.
All the arrangements of Swat until long after becoming Pakistan was the responsibility of the Swat which was a regular army and the law.
He has handed over to Swat arranged government under an agreement.
But unfortunately, that our governments have treated as mother with the Swat.
In Swat, after the end of the government of Swat, was not just any increase in the number of schools
Nor there was buying interest in and development.
In the present era, education who would get to reduce their number several times from the previous era.
Educational institutions by local Taliban in the North West Frontier Province of Pakistan is continuing to make the target.
Most schools have been destroyed in Swat district, most of them are girls.
So, not only the Taliban has also announced the ban on girls&apos; education in Swat.
Thousands of students are deprived from getting education.
Do you think that the girls ended the Taliban want to get what.
Why is the government still failed to stop these illegal actions.
What do you think the government should do.
The question was that it should be a I. and Pakistan have.
Because the people of Swat, now it has come to understand that the army is killing him not to serve the Taliban there can be only one night in five school, otherwise, people can be slaughtered by the main square of the city.
In Swat, when any government, said that the government would not set up a writ. to stop these illegal measures are successful?
Now that this question was recovered, when armed forces, weapons, modern and everything spying system is with the government, it should not be four Taliban control?
If the answer is that someone on his head, in secret, the hand is that neither is end their weapons and not it are caught.
Our work is that the work of Taliban, their Kale, international colonialism, it is easy
Now, 15 years ago, the war in Afghanistan was issued
There was a was controlled by the Taliban and the northern alliance with the help which was to help Russia, India and Iran.
Then suddenly changing circumstances, achievement of Taliban coming.
A and I have taken a former friend enemy so have also offered of dollars from the car.
Now this situation is that the war is still continuing, but also to help in Iran, India and Russia are the
As long as human beings would not create the feeling and that right and wrong, what is there to live only to human mistake.
For example, when a thief for stealing, is, if it appears that this idea at this time, is not a good thing to theft and robbery is a curse, it is also correct and he is &quot;from God, he will not stolen human
Similarly, as long as Israel is not feeling that to be wrong, and I am the blood and it would get the sentence until then, he will be played holy with blood in Gaza.
Etiquette!
The question is that war, armed, terrorism is the solution of the problems?
If not, then he, which is taken to the problems?
It correct that war, fanatic way does not solve problems but more, Barkat, is in them.
Palestine, Afghanistan, Iraq, to their same model, which have in South Africa.
To moral and struggle, Jihad, than the armed struggle.
Kashmiris in part comes into view is that he accepted the danger..
The third week of Israeli attacks on Gaza is continuing, and the number of deaths has reached about 1000.
Yet despite international diplomatic efforts were not the cease-fire.
And, according to estimates, after the attacks starting from December 27, have so far been transferred to safe areas by 90 thousand Palestinians left their homes.
On the other hand, relief organizations accuses of committing to the issue of the protection of Palestinian children, said that an entire generation of Palestinian children will be facing serious psychological and emotional problems.
You are saying.
Should be?
In Gaza, how lasting peace is possible?
Click here for details.
(grace note that the opinions of the letter will be published only in Urdu due to increasing the number of remarks.
On the board of the extra screen for this alt+shift Urdu.)
The Taliban.
Basit, Peshawar
Wake up to if the Taliban started to jihad were innocent people who will.
School who?
And kidnapping for ransom or get no ransom, saying the spy existing poles people who?
The Taliban, Islam is so harmful as any other nation or religion has not.
Pashtun,
Pakistan
All the Islamic world together to attack Israel if staff would only threatened, you will, that Israeli daddy honour will be many distressing to America
And the immediate ceasefire will not only be but the cease-fire.
But.. honour our Muslim rulers so heart and where.
Any Ahmad Nejad say that you are your courage in the BBC forum of the initiative and two big.
The responsibility of the peace and human rights take only Arabs, or voice against the oppression of Muslims that is not only imposed on the world, but it is the duty of the world.
This tragic incident, Bush has been the worst in service sins so far.
Way before ending June 30 financial year in Pakistan and looting in government institutions is just like this administration has signaled to Israel before its conclusion. Whether that choice.
On one hand, the United States says that the cease-fire to be.
On the other hand, the resolution on the UN resolution is approved, but practically both did nothing, there is only one point over that Muslims is fighting to the United Nations for action.
It should be the basis of its international organization and all Muslim countries to end the membership of the United Nations on the immediate.
Before us many examples, about where the United States and the United Nations are being before only promises and resolutions only loss was only of Muslims.
Their benefit. When the BBC is not find some publishing
Now all journalistic principles where blood undeserved particular Muslims buried, on the BBC to be on board.
Aware of their own
Itself away from some branch, that is the end of it, less to comment
By the Muslims.
In what is very much in and they are martyred themselves are saying, Muslims and Muslims like you lived in their say the Muslims Muslims
To [syja786]
Long ever suicide attacks in the forums of the BBC, it is targeted to a particular faith in front of terrorism in India.
These remarks against Islam is the word extremism
But who is extremist fitly from comments on this idea, you are writing against Iran in which has been a means of blasphemy.
Our Muslims could not understand that how long will face a sword.
Unarmed people in the bombardment of Israel should have no tears of blood, the heart?
But the fault is this anarchy, murder and destruction which we give the name of Jihad and the beautiful face of Islam are trying to meet.
When the majority of the Palestinian will accept the existence of Israel, Hamas have required that the rocket resulted or suicide attacks on Israel.
The two sides are monody.
The role of America and the United Nations, then we supports Israel&apos;s atrocities.
God give of a Muslim Ummah,,
Prize of the campaign against terrorism to this distressing place action of the terrorists and terrorism, &quot;Even if the real work that they are doing.
Otherwise. big on terrorism is possible without the backing of a leader? Who are the all know..
That is to see that, in the trial in simple language, it is said that Dad.
The head of tremendous should also carry a bomb and killed.
For, a funeral for the dead and give, are Arab leaders and is being asked.
The Israeli attack, should be?
Issue is actually giving aid that are not is their army nor any defense plan just think it. while sleeping in Negligence is that the heads of all the Muslim countries including Saudi fulfilled their responsibility.
Them immediately practical steps against Israel should.
Such countries and the closure of the car, but in their sorrow.
Salute all sister!
Ching advises Hamas to abandon its struggle in the name of peace in this time of difficulty with thousands and thousands of judicial injustice and them is equivalent to prove unsuccessful.
If Israel and its supporters are on their peak, will also be created in their house, because it is a natural law, the actions of America and Israel are working in Muslims of fertilizer in to created a suicide bomber.
Bacchanalian in the power, he is not coming to understand.
Abu Abdullah Pakistan
Now, Hamas and Israel to compromise should be stopped so blood and evil.
Mohammad Sarfaraz, Paris, France
Perfect rang:.
Duty are that Hamas. 100 is right on the truth, and &quot;atrocities&quot; against &quot;Jihad&quot; in Kandahar, &quot;is to be reduced even then it so it should be known that if not home, then left.
People who are claiming of love with love, and their love of God and His Prophet, human beings love to their quantity is!
After Muslims are, his book, the water in the world, the entire page years ordered by God.
Rehman, [p@ki$t@n]
G. is not order but not&apos; invitation of Islam &quot;order.
But is ordered against jihad against them.
Until this time with these people &quot;not be until they end - but it is not possible for it means that having exploded in go.
Brothers, is the destruction as a result of the killer of children.
But Ching friends has requested that all was not shelter, today, they were so strong that no one in the world admits not because all are a.
Not, not Sunni, bus, all of them are, and he made everything- of development in every opportunity.
In contrast, 55 Islamic countries have recently?
Behind in every opportunity, and now it is wise that such were the enemies are beating them and they are awaiting death.
It is necessary that all Muslim countries to be united and work together to prepare action against Israel.
Feroz Magsi, Jhang, Pakistan
And this is not a good strategy, that Israel to surrender. The Studies and development and world peace, and China, to staff.
Muslims have also are very and sources also.
It is the correct use.
First, the most terrible aspect of it is that Hamas and Alfatah could not in unity.
Arafat and killed by such organized only so that had been that for the Aqsa mosque, &quot;Jihad&quot;, to be the only intrepid nation of the region have weak and until Arafat and are not removed means from the way it was impossible.
The world is that after the death of these two Palestine is moment by moment
And lobby went to the council from above the moment by moment.
In 1974, the owner of a Pakistani Prime Minister of this world view was that all Muslim leaders with attendance at 100 in the first time was taken under a roof.
On this today. It is a very difficult task that not only should this nation focus its launched in alliance established
But to remove the differences of Muslims, it would be premature mission (Islamic Commonwealth) forward?
It is a body which was half a century.
There are many features.
Many times, his own people lived and paddy in the world so bad as yourself from any other source.
This and other features of which are human beings said in Iraq, Afghanistan, Iran, Pakistan,
And it is that Islam is than all those who knows that it will only expelled whenever firm and practical Islam was rescued. He only of Islam, Muslims and Muslims, because, at tells us that Islam has made on big path.
The process of bombing and missile attacks on Gaza by Israeli military planes is issued from December 27.
The attacks have so far been killed more than 300 Palestinian citizens.
Now after the air attacks, Israeli tanks and mail closed vehicles have also reached on Gaza border with full preparation of the ground action.
The UN Security Council demanded to stop violent actions immediately to Israel and the Palestinian Authority through a unanimous resolution in an emergency meeting.
However, Israeli authorities have said that they would continue their operations in Gaza until this time as long as they are not sure that rocket attack on Israel would be closed.
In your opinion, what Israel is correct to say that this is an attempt to defend the integrity of Israeli actions?
What is the international community to play its role in this situation?
Is this aggressive action independently belonged to the next elections in Israel?
Is the newly elected President of the United States could be expected of any improvement in the situation of the Middle East since taking office?
(grace note that the opinions of the letter will be published only in Urdu due to increasing the number of remarks.
On the board of the extra screen for this alt+shift Urdu.)
Palestine &quot;of Muslims in the world, is a sacred place, and this is part of our protection
And we keep it is the first attitude.
Israel and India was only made this country, because America has to find a day languish. and God is the incumbent torture on these unbelievers-Sajid Sadiq,
Night &quot;When cabin from brine rationales.
When there is without only prayers &quot;(Nawabzada Nasrullah Khan)
Such comments, BBC research published by the research.
Finally, dignity and impression is also keep up then.
The BBC is only correct. But fact- is the way of news.
How- to have and how to reduce the news.
.
The Chughtai
It now our Pakistani, especially to any one, and I was not in the growth of extremism and terrorism or writing on it, &quot;revenge&quot; in-beam seen.
The United Nations has said that apparently, the cause of human rights and peace, but it is the end of oppression and violence on Muslims and to hear words from his mouth, see that Hamas would stop attacks, for how long it will leave contested.
Muslims on one is wrong if people like America to leave the backing of Jews, God is the clear: that this nation will pass the life of the nation, and this nation will not only life, sometimes if courage is America&apos;s backing of them and then that of his.
To those who fell murder in the name of so-called and peace of the world, it clearly understood that peace in the world only to obtain justice &quot;may set up is off no judicial and genocide.
If genocide could find any nation have ended and the results of the election will be made after the actions of the Jews will not only be continued existence, but a kind of high today is impossible.
The poet
This is growing. Then are destroyed.
Is blood. Then Jim are.
Now who have other that terrorism?
In the category of terrorism, it all comes not only takes the pain all their own.
Other people have been the blood of Muslims against human beings are not or are so inexpensive. Such was not the red color of blood.
And now, came not a message?
The trial in the action of the Mumbai attacks was like Ching began his fire in your home is that the pain of the people are not next and it comes not in any pain, some may be a Muslim.
Lying on the road, were injured and how innocent faces resistance in the blood do that words were not available.
The Muslims helplessly, Miss a hand that there are people get killed in India, the entire world on Pakistan, as the body of evidence is demanded that action, otherwise we will
And on the other hand, Israel publicly is making the genocide of Muslims and the world is silent can&apos;t be tolerated.
- God have not and when it will end the city.
Effects of America, Israel is a joke.
Is a matter of the way for the elections, the ruling Awami. No doubt in this particularly talk of Israel remaining Barak, at the witness has not been contested against any ruling until today and not be colonialism white or Kala is only colonialism.
From the ongoing debate in the forum, it is clear that the sorrow of the death of any kind, but they have not been ignored.
It is called the debate that has given a life of democracy or for power.
If democracy was Aziz, and kept to leave that to 10 years in Musharraf&apos;s policies?
And then Pakistan is not affected when. Unfortunately, he then Pakistan routed when they had cases of freedom and power.
On this, it is not the only a few reminders to take human beings is being raised by the allegations.
Sana Khan
Some are his thoughts and that some of them might not be of help.
A and Qari
At the Mrs. you not only in Pakistan but (Sir) in 1992 in its four friendly countries and seven other countries also read about Mr., you should take.
Tariq,
&quot;do not. of which they are not from train
Was not happy living in the image of the cypress armpit.
Britain, he also was not a place and Hindu-Muslim have the development of the issue.
.
How much is a feeling in the style of our own nation and his party should take time, blind effects are only, but now, every take human beings to intellectuals who is being criticized and allegations on this, there is not only a few reminders.
Under a development, we have people.
Sana Khan
Some ignored the. It was thought that some of them might not be - a book like this burden &quot;stupid world not become.
Although Mumbai has been created disturbances in the ongoing negotiator process between India and Pakistan after the attack and we want to continue the talks to India.
If the war will talk, both sides would be the loss of human lives.
India says that Pakistan was held in Mumbai attack is urban and it has sent a letter written to Pakistan in Urdu, but on the other hand, India, first, when the extremist held, said that this is a great engineer, but after that, he said, it only four parties have declared this point of view.
First, accept Mr. congratulated Forum and friends of Christmas.
Forum: Sahib, A. Raza, sister Sana, sister Shahida Akram and courtesy to all.
We are all want the flowers of peace but not war!
As the war itself is an issue
The issue will be resolved.
Fire and blood today.
Hunger and will give tomorrow
The knowledgeable people
If war is better.
You and in our area
Candle were earlier, better.
India-US relations are now have very deep and India know that time when America Pakistan Open cheated.
America is also the old.
In the case of the Indian attack, America will also get their objectives and spent will be India.
Pakistan should not be clear until this time will announce that we will not table but was then compromise talk of peace and ceasefire until India completely destroyed or whether the occupation is not activities for that we do not go destroyed.
Islamic at.
Before this resolution, the Pakistani people and the army was the message they give..
Droll than getting foreign ordinary diplomatic and military issues in the construction of the attacks affected by the Indian efforts are making even, on initial strong international reaction, now the world has reduced pressure on Pakistan..
India is ambassador,, than the need for India, therefore, noise, not in a show on their way, the efforts of the United Nations and the head of Interpol to admire the Pakistani efforts.
On this matter, no two opinions that this is a very, very brutal action.
But the question is that when thousands of Taliban were attacker on Monday Sami Ullah, where the Pakistani army was and what had been?
He was there in a year that should not be the accountability of the Army?
Many Taliban are killed every day in the thousands, they are mortar and cannon shells?
ISI appeals that the patronage of the Taliban to leave and we will live with peace in heaven Benazir Swat.
To stop this counterfeit operation.
In the United Nations, the day is not far when the resolution of military intervention in Pakistan was passed against him as such.
Ahmed Farooqi
First, we are going to be provided with all the evidence and justification for action against the extremist and his one and not in our favor, that day was also presenting a resolution, the chances are that the voice is also in the United Nations.
And hypothetically was in this resolution to be passed, the example of America in front, there is no power under self help. Both will run.
In Allah and achievements and information, we may not have to.
He was not a revolutionary.
Way, Nawab Bugti, Dr. has been at the hands of the enemies of God and thousands of dead bodies.
Die if they are are also imperative.
But, a being the international, people from the horror and brutality is being intimidated by the government.
Could that have created the justification that we will not come to such inhuman and then government &quot;.
Naming the religion of Islam, this action is highly condemnable unduly.
Supporters of these extremists are on the oppression of the United States, England, but instead of grief over the brutal actions like this, they give the name of the tribal traditions, clean border are fish.
The cloak of tribal traditions close, sometimes with the name of Islam, the heart of any person for this kind of brutal action could not have it.
In my opinion, the people of our army to get these people.
He felt that when they do move noted, it is time, cost, so it will be enough for, but so far to the occasion if they are also there, there are darn cycle.
Do they see as the spectators are so powerful that they are abducted 50 70 men, and our army will hand on hand.
They are also human beings of Allah and army.
It is obvious that some pulse is black.
Like, dictator like contrast to highlight and mode of God from the period of time, and to set up the atmosphere of fear in the name of religion is seen in this body will be after the death of their and, besides the incident. The books are not created fear.
And his people are doing this fear as a tool or just and execution of dignity and Jalal.
&quot;!
Fire from Hell where it to you.
That itself became a situation of fear.
Is when it is said that this work could not be a Muslim.
We are at their own or witnesses are not reconciliation.
Daughter refused after a closed door of the Prophet have continuously in the head and her husband had embraced in line put who walked with?
Have they had come from outside?
On the army and Karbala. and that was laid?
The facts are made without motives were removed not surrender. out.
BBC&apos;s policy demanded closed.
Better than this topic super hit titled: &quot;If Bush shoes were legitimate or illegitimate?
&quot;preferably.
, Japan
A man with a delegation from the grave out electricity been specific means that it has raised his voice against the oppression, and you have been lying on the topic of the box office.
Depending on the other side of the border and the line of depends on it, is that the public opinion is in favor of what.
This step is only and Pakistani bomb and are while facing the conspiracy in person.
In this forum, now because all discussions will be based on the Taliban opposition, secret had been included in the Taliban. And they are steps which could change the opinion of the common people.
Then only in his search for a whole day when that it was the body, the army. The statement that he has only target the common people, there are also some so they are &quot;bombardment on the whereabouts of Taliban, house shells, two children and their mother, were killed.&quot;
That was not address in this area about?
Or sport was?
We are already hand manipulation and credit and prayer that God is stopped.
Finally, you are on a ruling.
The question was asked by the BBC is sorry to see superficialness of those writing may be reasonable, for example, a question has been asked not to have 30 thousand troops present in Swat?
The bodies of those who help the army to fight the Taliban are always on poles throughout the day.
Swati with people over the next step that the Pakistani Army, but the media, including the BBC, the world is not good to keep the actual reality anonymous.
The Pakistani army is drama.
Swat that every child is that this is a bloody drama.
The bus. drama.
The Taliban had bad place as the name of the Muslims.
In the whole world, if true Muslims say not to them, these terrorists in their area to find a place.
Bin who are feeling are labor wages which are included in the group are not carrying a gun.
Islam is not with the power of the gun or sword.
Shame demanded.
The reason is not in on is not in any other religion.
Their comments from various sources about all the Taliban and tribes, including the BBC.
But the address on the situation. It is not a situation that time. If we know because we are tribal.
There is not a student in summary, is that it is a, they are not included the C. A., came to a RAW, and our own tribal it are these rebellions elements who are defamed Islam, Taliban, schools, Pashtun people, tribes and tribal.
With this move, the head of all Muslims were petulancy with shame?
In presenting leader Hussein A. P and P. P. I are talking against against the Taliban.
It is, they were then, but Pakistan were also destroyed.
But in the present that I will end this.
After the attacks in Mumbai, India said that behind these attacks, Pakistan is the hand of some extremist elements.
Pakistan has denied the charges and said that he will help India in investigation in every way.
India has said that it has given a list to Pakistan, in which they are given the name of 20 suspected extremists, who wanted to India.
Now, Pakistan has said that head of the Jaish-e-Mohammad, Maulana Masood Azhar included in this list are not detained and the government of Pakistan has no information about them.
Earlier, Pakistan President Asif Ali Zardari has been rejected the impression that Western intelligence agencies and the Indian government has provided evidence about the Mumbai attacks.
About Ajmal butcher, the President said that it was not yet proved that he is Pakistani.
Meanwhile, Prime Minister Singh said Pakistan has warned that it could not improve relations with India until then unless there, head of the land will be used for terrorism.
And the latest progress in India and cricket team has canceled a visit to Pakistan.
Should these political incidents affect sports lie?
You have the future of relations between Pakistan and India.
Pakistan not broke America will not.
The Pakistani himself.
Such a communal expects and after you have?
The Jinnah has also proved with Muslims have not good at this time.
Yasmin, Hires
Mrs. if Jinnah lived continued work on his vision, not provincialism, and priestcraft cancer spread in Pakistan nor is such behavior with Muslims in India.
But our fault is that they could not create a leader of such stature.
We could not, if the amount of their heroes
In this region, are many.
Only God knows how long will come to mind, and with the blessing of the consensus, it should develop the region.
Mullah, philosopher, Taliban, in both countries, a R. were against a, peace...
And not wished that it should progress with the peace of the region so these countries is the puppet dance.
You can imagine that agreed with the area of Pakistan, India and China will be a place in the world....
On Pakistan, God is torture as the thieves, robbers and imposed on the nation..
God should never on our country Pakistan did not, a fire.
But a person opened its surrounding circumstances and facts, you will come to see that where forces are reached.
Besides that, national issues are also not been in place, the situation of Frontier, Balochistan and Sindh and Karachi are in front of you.
The situation in the country is the need for a trial that we could make a United Nation.
Or God forgive mercy on us.
Ching without a final war is not a remedy.
A bus has.
Now, the issue should only be be R. or overseas.
His talks with hypocritical will not solve the problem.
Not only a small marginal terrorists in other countries.
End to Europe, it was only after the last war fighting.
And it was not war is it all the altercation altercation like Pakistan and India have only been till today.
We all agree on this matter are that the country should be the elimination of terrorism and communal.
But our army do not be sincere in this work, had a hand, America and Europe, that is the act of terrorism in this war, we are with you, on the other hand, the secret of the Taliban are to help.
We now think it and its direction is to choose the path of their people and only one, Automic
There is no doubt in the fact that the majority among the party is only those members of Lashkar-e-that-were included in the party set up by the name of the Jamaat-i-Pakistan after to cater as null and void.
However, then these workers has given preference to the relief work and UN has quashing it on the insistence upon India and Pakistan were also continue its crackdown against them.
In my opinion, if the hardline groups left religious extremism, religious and relief activities continue, better.
In Pakistan, there are organisations who keep young people, Paul young military crimes in the name of Jihad? and they are saying, big, are those who have to go to Pakistan and..
Now it left not a stone in Pakistan to be destroyed.
In fact, this Muslim, have not entitled to human.
Pakistan were free from the rebels without national security in danger.
That is still has a capacity of thinking that they should not banned?
Fanatical&apos;s place in the world is not only work to kill.
The heart from this news is a thief.
It what is a world where an important member of God that Islam also called today for the parties, it is difficult to survive in the world.
Non-Muslim, can kill Muslims, but if the Muslim should also try to take revenge, all non-Muslim world, together with his all hypocrite ruler, sincere and true religion do the same treatment with pain to those who are with our great leader Hafiz Saeed today.
Mumbai, India in retaliation of the attacks.
Pakistan has been created bitterness in relations and the future improvements in recent years in the relations between the two countries is a severe shock.
India is responsible to active military and non-military groups in Pakistan
And the relationship is being on action against these groups to return to normal.
While Indian security agencies has settled force directly responsible for the Mumbai attacks
In this regard, repeated party&apos;s name is also a front joy.
This is not the first time that relations between the two countries due to any terrorist action in India was serious.
The two neighbours arrived on the brink of war after the attack on the Indian Parliament in December two thousand one.
After that, year 2000 banned Lashkar-e-in two and it was included in the list of terrorist groups.
Now, on the party, about which the security analyst says that is the new shape of Lashkar-e-in fact, ban is being demanded.
Do you think this group should be banned or not?
Also Pakistan should take decisive action against extremist groups active on its soil?
Do the current India to ban on Jamaat.
This crisis is get out of the way and armed groups for a lasting peace between the two countries is much needed to be closed?
The UN Security Council has imposed a ban on the party, and the Security Council have evidence that are shown such speed on this?
Have no activity against Muslims, not the Security Council?
They are saying that the slow witness smart!
Next, then India has become a failed itself!
Of which, the army and other institutions have failed, for 72 hours at the hands of a few terrorists are round. and put on Pakistan, India accused of his failure is giving deceptive to the entire world.
This song is taking noise in the whole world and be a dissident murder?
Country Aziz only, and welfare organization, 3-3, 3-6, 3-3.
Furqan Farooq, Abdul,
Means, Islam, peace was quite satisfied and until our (), and all the people love and respect.
Muslims have also the development in every opportunity.
This beautiful climed captured us in Benares blasphemous and started a new chapter of and riot started opening which had not known before the world.
... Mr. desire to build but do this action on his bill.
Do not come in America.
If India is distressing should provide proof?
Is not?
And for every thing we have put?
In India, the extremist groups and organisations are, they should not restrict his people?
Have we are only a terrorist in the entire world?
India, who is in Kashmir, they have?
Israel is that they have?
It is true that we are the world&apos;s first Islamic, are fighting.
Pakistan is now in its final stages.
Kamranhassan, Abu Dhabi
You is any thing heart and some conditions are also looking only such
And now, magazines published in Pakistan with a new element that is attached to, and it is coming for part of the same process.
Its grip on Pakistan are not slowly, but now a Speeded up.
In the event, if we have not show unity and consensus of the people as a nation, if Bangladesh may become, and there may be a lot.
Scare around the attacks should also be condemned, it is less, whether they are in a hotel in Mumbai or in Islamabad hotel and or even in Palestine.
Such terrorists as well, they should be removed, whether they are Pakistani, Indian or I am and.
Now that the question is created, it would have been a terrorist attack in Pakistan every day, hundreds of people are not killed, Pakistani officials on them, the whole world is silent.?
Have the hotel have been was not a terrorist attack?
Then.
Foot home Rehman Malik Sahib, said many of the officials and were are!
According to the C, where the UN Security Council has imposed a ban on (a) the party, there, Mr. Malik said that we did not imposed and very carefully and thought only after such. Be
Not, according to the BBC, Mr. Malik has said the intensity with the impression is wrong, it means that the terrorists are being brought in, some say, process.
God, Subhan!
Ability to or not to or it wants not said that.
We are fighting the Pakistani whose.
And our interests are to which we all effort.
No one is not to interfere in any foreign country.
The era of apparently come.
If people are expected to justice or upon the implementation of its independent judiciary staff do respect the Republic institutions and do not support a dictator or military, will establish peace in the world including Pakistan and that perhaps is not acceptable.
Pakistan, and is a doctor in the submission of the objectives.
This is despite opposition from a dominant population of Pakistan.
And this is further opposition emotions.
If democracy and its allies are in confidence, the settlement procedure to leave the region to respect the sovereignty to be run.
In Pakistan, so is that whether he or she should.
Security Forces raided a suspected camp of the banned Lashkar-e-in Pakistan-administered Kashmir.
After the Mumbai attacks is increasing pressure on Pakistan to accelerate action against extremist organizations.
India has alleged that the attacks in Mumbai is the hand of Lashkar-e-.
The American Jews Lisa Rice has said that the Pakistani leadership should be a practical demonstration of a transparent and immediate action against officials of the Mumbai attacks.
They say past Mumbai attacked the militants to use Pakistani soil.
Meanwhile, officials in Peshawar said that coalition forces deployed in Afghanistan, a base of the trucks taking goods has been imposed unknown armed men fire, which destroyed more than 50 trucks.
This is the second attack on NATO and American supplies during 48 hours in Peshawar.
This has raided a suspected camp of the banned Lashkar-e-during and before, have also been several attempts to disarm the armed groups from Karachi to the tribal areas, which has long been assured to give compensation to those to return weapons and took no action.
The situation to end the armed groups are not that Afghan interference of the former Soviet Union in the period of General Zia-ul-Haq and the U.S. to give birth as a result of the resistance, starting from a Saudi such environment before 1980 were not successful attempts to go back to Pakistan.
The question is what Pakistan wants it?
What is this capability of Pakistan?
What are you?
Click here for details.
(grace note that the opinions of the letter will be published only in Urdu due to increasing the number of remarks.
On the board of the extra screen for this alt+shift Urdu.)
My only a question of all:
If you come with their children if they lose your behalf, it is impossible,
Saeed, Multan
And my question to you that studies from Islamic studies to East and West, no logic, and philosophy for the attack, the murder of innocent people including, labor and employment, young is allowed?
And if the answer is not in dire need of reform in your own.
It was feared that Russia conception to Pakistan after Afghanistan so the armed people have been armed people have been at this time.
Now, when it is feared that America will run climbed on Pakistan through which are current President has openly expressed in his presidential campaign, we do armed foreigners to these people?
So only after America or India, the Pakistani army may not face any kind of public resistance?
Yes, if any of them are involved in any action, Pakistan will only take action against it.
But unfortunately, it is the government of India has become a force was declared the time. It is involved in Pakistan.
Rehman, [p@ki$t@n]
If it be granted activities that Lashkar-e-involved is still not time for the Pakistan Government.
And that is also a question that these terrorists to get the help of any government or Foreign official Indian officials had not?
That terrorists are only have created or in Pakistan and India and in countries of the world are not?
As far as power is concerned, terrorism is not connected with it.
It is to maintain that Hafiz: he was first, jihadi leader, who was, hell, it means of Taliban.
I had strong fear is that the Taliban insurgency is part of the projects, so it is necessary to remove a person from the way which any connection to challenge to the Taliban.
Despite the cooperation of the entire nation, coming in Indian pressure to take action against military and soap is referring to.
Beginning from America Saudi campaign to end the application. Now that the pollution which has by our society.
Their protest. How under Saudi and America has been dangerous weapons and so-called jihadi hatred and culture in our country, from which the human slaughter open in our country.
After the threat of an attack by India, the Pakistani Army has announced that the Afghan border forces will give India&apos;s attention and their full strength of Taliban, it declared that the Afghan border were badly and that India and Pakistan should not attacked.
Been opened the whole fear of power in the region.
Although India has threatened to attack if not nor was such courage.
The entire was no Taliban attacks on supply.
This was not something that America without the support of the Pakistan Army and the Pakistan Government.
Karachi, Pakistan&apos;s business center, all so sick areas of Dubai.
Hundreds of thousands of empty hands, sometimes not, but when the western border areas in supremacy of law has been the attention of Karachi has been taken.
Now they are fixed for the kidnapping of the city.
First, is attached to say Pakhtoon, who is making new people of a city, though it is solidarity.
A solution of the problem is that it or, Urdu-speaking pushto or pushto-speaking Urdu, or all the English, and well.
If you have a parody because of a clash that not ridicule?
That is the language because of violence?
The Chughtai
Mr. Bar in childhood in his friends in which people of all religious and Classes were included in this bo given, people used laughed on these things.
At this time, their religious and linguistic, who had not quick and powerful that the condition today had been inside the bus inside.
It is it. And that comes not only?
Have?
The innocent and who have been killed in a crime?
Before the reasons are that Pakistan have pieces. They are active and that it all, are not have neither any, and their country.
Karachi, Mumbai or house has started the fire at home.
A government that is being spent in the name of the name of the only places are not, as now that airport, roads, blood all.
That are the meaning of which is with Karachi and Pakistan?
At the peak of the Mumbai attacks of trying to start sectarian riots in Karachi by raw failed to prove it is that in the past, raw elements working on its role had now resign from this job?
Pushto-speaking work it was confined to blood injustice and the Indian from Karachi..
The full response from the hub of all the political, religious, linguistic and national parties where Indian diplomatic etiquette, they are also provided a chance to think plan makers there..
The responsibility of the deteriorating situation in Karachi is fast and A. P. and administration impartiality.
Situation in the administration can control, but John and it was being Agency..
, police and government to take action because of the pressure of the parties.
Of alliance are limited to statements, parties should abandon their interests and to work for the interests of the common man.
Until the pressure on the administration to keep such incidents will, God in his order to Pakistan.
The biggest terrorist in the Ching are people.
And in this, there certainly are at work, but he is not that not address?
But unfortunately, it is that if any border city in such situations, then the government does resurrection of there. But when it is not in the border, the government has shown a bus.
The government should take and to save a large and important city of the country from terrorism.
Otherwise, Pakistan will be facing a major financial crisis.
BBC Urdu writing any while Pakistan&apos;s condition, and not true for fear.
The whole truth is present on the BBC English.
A solution of the problem is that it or, Urdu-speaking pushto or pushto-speaking Urdu, or all the English, and well.
Because of the collision, a mock if you will, but you have not ridicule?
That is the language because of violence?
In Karachi, a storyteller of cruelty was finally money that fear every citizen were felt for a long time.
Which run as a bus, he did not leave any stone coming on the 50. who was in four days.
The last three woke up and insecurity is also now.
And military boss to vacate hotel killing the people.
On Super Highway, the looting and the mine cutting all are unaware of agony of God who will never been brought to them.
You think about the unrest, what are the reasons?
()
India&apos;s heart ten &quot;in front of the murder, Exploring the cause of the disorder in Karachi we set is definitely not required but completely, and it is the reason that it was only because of the blood, chaos.
Obviously, the fact is that if someone will take wish-wash with the father, that,, run out, was not the run out of control.
Was also of blood, Ali Khan and a person is writing the wrong time?
The elders, we will
Life-giving John will give.
Faizan,
Is a matter of regret, the whole country is stuck at risk at this time, and we are deprived in each other.
Mr. has stated that if wikipedia.
Currently in Ali Khan, know that you belong to a respectable Punjabi of Karnal area of Punjab province.
Today immigrants because the measures for their migrants&apos; own.
If the reaction is only.
For its part, could have tolerated.
Ijaz Awan
Mr. earlier that up also collected one night, Jim, tells you that harassment are being in the form of open, you today on wall and posters of Karachi.
We both are coming.
The villains, Pakistan and founder of Pakistan also not spared,&apos; we do not have to face any reaction.
Again, the Pakistan military upon heart are.
It was always a Muslim League (N) has also given with a draft amendment of the Peoples&apos; Party.
Prior to this, the MQM and Muslim League (Q) have deposited the draft of the amendment in the National Assembly and Senate.
Still, it seems that the amendment is a political ploy, and no one is not sincere in to approve this amendment.
That is why any till now has forced lamentation not in favor of the amendment on the floor of the assembly or senate nor house that he would approve the amendment.
Like the feel that they have secured a kerosene chandelier depositing the draft of the amendment that we have been able to say that yesterday, the Speaker had deposited the amendment is not only the action.
MQM government coalition, the party to have Muslim League (N) ally of the government and Muslim League (Q) 17th amendment, then how can the parties are sincere to end 17th amendment.
It is the pretext of name in color and martyrs.
People&apos;s Party, but it is not quick to finish 17th amendment.
How can a good thinking of their hands.
Not until President are the end of 17th amendment.
It was the opinion of the majority in our a survey and is also true.
If 17th amendment may be removed, then the President never comes.
Now, they are also more powerful person with President Pervez Musharraf because he is also the Chairman of the People&apos;s Party with a president.
As long as he is President, 17th amendment is established.
Political parties will have to dismiss the first President to end 17th amendment from presiding over the house.
It is not to the MQM, and not other parties.
Our family often belong to a senior labor class.
And when in childhood, we see the defeat to his uncle, uncle, etc., to create the same desire in my heart that God save us from the physical labor wages.
To avoid this, we wrote a letter to the editor of the daily today and asked that we should be after the matriculation and that we need to do physical labor.
Editor wrote in reply that to become a doctor or engineers and ((essays catch fire.
Our trend was started by the same, and we have also read as Technical drawings instead of in the matriculation.
But at the time of the entry in the S. C., big brother has forced that we F. S. C. Dr. made in medical.
We have read barely one month as and when a play had not taken subject to account for it.
-- fear of physical labor has made us engineers and now we are on a good position in many of his family, on which we live pay thank God every time.
It, it came to US when we were trying raising the carpet of the old home with his two young sons.
Now work that was not even half an hour, a small son spoke &quot;deadline, it did not create this work.&quot;
We said if it is true, then our way quite see John shackle to read and physical labor.
The son said it read, I am, and it will also go, but this is not my work.
As we all have finished the work in three hours and returned home.
This means to say that the reason behind this matter with the consequences if the man is at work, there couldn&apos;t stop him to the floor.
Yes, if you have to know that is not only then you remembers only God.
On the first anniversary of Benazir, we are saying that Murray, bad judgment, but should be seen as their evil.
Benazir has provided an opportunity to concentrate fully provided India to the list of Sikhs fighting the war of independence, the Sikhs ran over the freedom movement in Kashmir after India and other hand because the movement of Punjab for their interests.
And the power of Nawaz Sharif is a part of the daily history push by several years back to the country.
Benazir has continued during the negative statements on Kashmir and nuclear program in exile.
Violation of the London agreement with Benazir and Nawaz Sharif, a deal with General Musharraf.
Benazir has given the opportunity openly turns out to their husbands during their power and due to this reason that Mr. metal known
In the age of Benazir, his brother was murdered and the murderer of which are still giving children from punishment.
Benazir avoided fight the war of women&apos;s rights despite the woman.
As a way of Benazir politics on the body of his father, now their husbands are politics on his body.
Benazir got the government to two times, but they did not punish the culprits of the political murder of his father, has registered a case against them.
To separate East Pakistan from us, were a year and our people and leaders mourned not feeling that someone at the end of the day, and not mourning on their mistakes.
But, it was likely that we do such measures and December 16 celebrating the day as a warning that this accident is not developing happening again.
To this day, we sent messages to the people of Bangladesh, and they tried to again.
Government open the file of the commission and to consider the reasons for the separation of East Pakistan in this.
Tactic to bring back Beharis stranded in Bangladesh, and encourage them to send them gifts.
But we have a sense in our neighborhood, there should be no action is now reported.
We are not thinking of their sisters and brothers, because we have.
We have lost in their normal life and the next day, a major tragedy should be passed.
If this kind of East and West Germany were again similarly, East and West Pakistan can also be a again.
We can again if they come out of the shell of a second sacrifice staff and self-love.
But this does not desire that is completely in the near future.
Today when the news was told that the governor of the U.S. State kin was arrested on corruption charges
Removing it from the governorship and provincial Congress as soon as possible to prepare for the scrutiny, it is an edit, one of our American colleagues, of which Pakistan is a deeper look at the situation, we see that pride, democracy, it says.
In the United States, a big man law is not past
And your country is Pakistan which is made after giving the president also dropped corruption charges.
Our vessel, fun, and we have said, if a governor in America has been arrested, we in Pakistan, one night, the prime minister was arrested by hanging a time and the second time was Badar country.
Never had it in the United States?
In Pakistan, departure from the Presidential House with the guard of breaking the law of the country, the United States, sometimes it was?
In Pakistan, the Chief Justice that it was suspended, despite the public support, he still could not be restored, in America, what was it?
In Pakistan, the fake degree holder was made, what was it in the United States?
The hearing was also accepted his responsibility with was demi and let us poor goose.
In this picture, President Zardari smiled despite being surrounded in Americans from all sides.
Takes his smile.
It is understood that the United States is with his government but they have forgotten that these people were with Musharraf a year ago.
This picture, such has been like a family.
Prior to this, sometimes this kind of photo meaning three American officials with a president not printed in newspapers.
It is the work of the United States has been increased in Pakistan, and now more than one together, it is forcing or there is no trust that these new Ghulam who was on the earlier.
It may also have promised President Zardari of, these arrangements have been made.
If any sensible government, at least 20 on the faces of their teeth not in the picture and this is certainly apparent embarrassment.
If the principle of democracy will be implemented on this picture, President Zardari are in the minority.
According to democracy, the majority is the ruler of the country, and he who is this picture is speaking.
Swat like heaven are called Pakistan.
So far are being dialogues with power, according to the government strategy.
But some besides increasing the strength of the power and to create sympathy for these people was not given.
It is necessary that the place of power should end the reasons of the government.
By the end of the reasons, Fazal God and the Taliban itself will finish by themselves.
ANP will create a cause of Swat solution to the extent of the bill on behalf of the government.
But with the Shariah, the government will also consider the economic
General Musharraf to begin, it was settled that the nation will get rid of corner if entitled policies but the power change all these intentions with CNN
Who also to the &quot;systematic Regret&quot; in the inexhaustible in understanding.
He ended, and those measures was expected.
Elimination of Bush, they began to think of the end of their power and thieves in given.
General Musharraf is that the present government is not known. But it was also able to control the army.
Bajaur, Swat or army does not control and bombed &quot;enemy&quot; is not on the public with human casualties and property loss, given the mental element to the enemy, the enemy, we are not
More than a year in the troubled Swat region of the North West Frontier Province issued a military operation, despite the corruption are worse.
On one hand, the writ of the government in this area only Condemnatory resolution in the national assembly has been reduced to the extent, and on the other hand, the influence of Taliban illegal FM radio channel is more used in Swat.
The third hand civilians thought in this opinion is that in this area, the practice of this rule is to be heard.
According to one estimate, 80 percent have been established on Swat Swat know in the claim of killing of several extremists from the bombing as almost helicopter gun ships and cannon during the action of the security forces, but despite these killings, Taliban not only have more stable, but his government.
As a result, it is not ready for its failure stress that the government on one hand and on the other hand, Taliban remain stable.
In between who, the most generous citizens.
In Swat, now it is said that a asked how the Taliban are people, the response was very good because they are conservative and religion, are fighting against the enemies of God and religion.
Then the army that was asked what is, he found that very good because they are protecting the country against the enemies of the country &quot;.
Then was asked who is the enemy of the country and religion, to get US citizens.
I am surprised that with the Pakistani Army, the Indian army, how will that he could not control a small group of Taliban.
The FM channel operating illegally of Taliban could not track that is very easy in my opinion.
But even then, the FM whole water and patience with poison throw up.
Girls schools. Now, the school of boys are being destroyed.
The curfew is alleged that Taliban could facilitate movements.
Today, during the night curfew has made eight trucks crossed into the outskirts of during the curfew.
The question is that they reached out there despite the curfew.
The army Akbar Bugti, murder and Taliban in home.
For God, the army understand that a bus of Swat people expelled from the grip of the Taliban and it will prove that the Pakistani Army can be won on any enemy.
Hazrat are the most blood faiths in the world has been on, religion is not, if you tell me that staff. his blood is not harm?
Punjabi, Pathan, black and white, enviable and other tribes have it all of religion?
Must not a fight that education is not only, Mr., religion is not a issue is not a refugee, otherwise, if not religion, the bitterness of half the world and caste community in fighting human beings become abstruse.
Actually, but only human beings does morally bound train. And it is not our choice, but the creator of this world, it has to be, and it is to live according to the same order.
As a Muslim, I had all that Islam is a complete. And it is the true religion.
Every morning in the years after the residence in London on the first to know of his other relatives, though it was not a time our news by phone, then I feel our call to them that we would not leave the call..
Two years when living in France occurred in the feel...
Regimen people only, we may keep hoped the phone.
On Iraq, has no problem to have, in a few hours, peace, the army.
Mumbai is the work of ban on immediate condemnation of the attacks and suspected organizations, a few hours.
And where death is again to dance on this, we are advised advice.
Oh here, life is ending of world peace.
What really is then wait for the end of it.
So that it could not even think wider as catapult for a victim to their right to use the weapons of mass destruction?
When a person is being raised part of his liver, then a wave of pain in any part of the heart bouncer?
If not, you are not entitled to human.
But is a black spot in the name of humanity.
If it was proved that this area is home to thousands of years.
But it is that both nations together in each other, and love, but they are in the hands of Western and Arab countries, since it could not establish peace without their will for ever.
But now, Iran also wanted to fight with its war.
Action was also stop on temporary basis, it will be launched after an incident.
BBC the interests of the country are linked with America and Israel, and that is the reason, bright, it in the front, &quot;with a group of Warid was and blind, propaganda, and it is.
BBC is complete only,, and just as it is the purpose and interaction.
Sahib is that votarist published this comment. So that some idea is that the BBC is still remaining in facts, a little bit of humor.
Automic.
Every time in the blood of innocent people are not address his story, who has written in existence, but it is a fact.
In every time used to stop. And every time in the blood is flowing.
But the fact is that this man, who is a civilized adoption yourself day and head of the century common is silent on the murder of the people,
This does not feel that whatever they are, are presenting a bad shape.
It is unfortunate and sad aspect that coming to this aspect of human beings will made a century and picture before human beings..
Deccan,,
At this time, the country with Dera Ghazi Khan is the rain in winter.
According to weather a discipline is absent, along with the discipline, rain can.
The rain also are you
The year was, Bihar.
The stay was, as.
It was coming so due to a
At this day was never conquered
Sometimes noise is ever more &quot;.
The rain also are you
A night in a memory
One was buried the ash
Sometimes it was that instead.
Sometimes themselves burnt themselves
Some gradual grief C..
The rain also are you
Were all these leaders are being one who want to take the case, what, country or less.
People with tooth-paste or lemon peel is destructive of Temples.
One, our media is also forbidden as rulers.
The purpose is only collect money from the government, and nothing.
Are people, he was illiterate, the great ignorance to talk about it.
Noon yesterday was a strange case.
All of the police here is a race on parking is not ask.
And, the nypd traffic should also be illegal Park vehicles that was not in the mood.
Was there was proof that a U.S. air plane really became the plane and landed in the river.
So far only know that &quot;terrorists&quot; belong to the generation of birds goose.
Yesterday was a historic cold of New York.
This amount is not.
Itself is attached to my jaw pain from outside the range of half an hour.
Hence, establish that these people were jumping from the plane in the river, the situation would be made.
Happy thing is that all people of all are safe.
And it is unfortunate that the aircraft of the company was drowning in this crisis.
In all this was looking to see the way like the West side and was also seen that the South is closed did it?
G. was stuck in the same rush in return.
Thanks, I had only opened some measure during an hour, that I was receiving the exit of 56 Street.
No, struck on the first two exit lines were to be seen.
Buffet, my Pakistan: A Mubarak you Eid Mubarak.
: of course, faith
Bloom: A Mubarak, you Eid Mubarak.
Sarah: if the two fowl is sacrifice is made, and as they are Jahanzeb has telling
Besides this, and no way.
Transcribe including hides and meat after being on the form is also hardly make themselves.
: India - the right to take time.
What happened on the forum?
.
Hark to see, two hands.
: A Mubarak, you Eid Mubarak.
Sir G. used a crane.
Snow will be missing.
We consider non-civilized. In free Swati Talabani faction who were weepingly only on the education of women.
The reserve every day or not anywhere they were expressed by demolishing the women&apos;s school and college.
But most ideas like this idea was also not prove correct, Barkat day Talabani faction with CNN today on Monday, according to the news of the boys, a school was demolished with explosives.
Swat, Taliban has demolished a school of boys.
Girls&apos; schools, in fact, the English word &quot;ladies first&quot; process were demolished a while ago, you are still not Taliban-civilized and civilization devoid savage say why downward.
This thing is also clear that Talabani faction and the allegation that they are only against the education of girls, is not true.
But if they are against the education.
God-given them the mujahideen and power, and infernal government
Who is imposed on us, it causes to help them in. &quot;
Amen, Amen.
Now, one hundred eighty two schools have to be demolished.
Muslims born before a permanent thing is to be wise and adult in this tradition, and many subtle that girl eight years to marry the Quran in the name of tradition, property, collecting, in India, that was not only less frog with the girl was married in the news.
Look at the picture was taken on the occasion of the marriage of the bridegroom.
Meanwhile, some time ago, the marriage of a girl with a dog was also fresh.
He also witnessed the bridegroom.
In the 21st century, humanity is scarce.
Nowadays is removed and the intervention of a computer is widening in every walk of life.
As many people have many on the growing interference of a computer on financial issues.
Where you are with the use of credit cards is also better law enforcement agencies on your private life to this relationship.
That financial issues such as the use of credit cards can now only been your address from the record.
And the benefits of this will be increased and the actual use in future will be very low.
Similar crimes are taken blew up a credit card information instead of taking the risk of robbing a bank in the world.
Similarly, now have become sources of friendship
As social networks working web sites, book, fees and Mai popularity is meant in the first class.
But do you not think that their social net works are amenable, practical people mentally as we are the same age.
Similarly, the web site of the match, where you like, like other people, which suits Mullah, the list of the people has been showing you.
So what you can just spending their lives with another person as his?
If I could not ask for this, Jeevan colleague says the better half.
They will meet the defects that they have in me.
I got only under some part in mind.
From childhood, there was also a big saying is very true for me.
As was sure the world is known to every question.
My very fun on this.
But only he was a true assessment which may be possible.
That is very confusing false was also needed.
In this age, it also raised a loss.
Therefore, I try lies at least.
A false Lara sentiment, and he also attached with the name of God.
And stronger already say when pray to God to fulfill that work.
Of the remaining recently, only God knows better.
This is a nasty problem which has been created due to a distance from religion.
According to both religion and law of Pakistan, innocent children should live with the mother.
The cost is the responsibility of his father and the father can work with children.
And when children will be affected, that continue to live with it.
You also is correct that the real problem Aziz are friends and relatives who taught signs.
Just thinking is rampant on all our deeds.
Here, the same thinking is work that will create new parts in the property of the father, and is opposed to this, otherwise the process of their father is appreciable and forgery.
These spasm about our relationship has created social evils.
, and a widow, the concept of marriage is becoming scarce.
The senseless unfair and religious traditions are due to which the family system is the victim of the conflict.
In our society, if a 50 year old man to be dispatched as aha if the wife or husband of a wife and take the second marriage, it is not seen as a good view?
A Pakistani uncle near US, his wife, 10, were died 12 years ago, now to the marriages of all children, after he was married to a woman, a widow, children were against them.
In my view, this is their legitimate right you are you?
We are there to take the place of our mother, this will not be tolerated by us what kind of thinking is thinking?
In my view, the offspring of the person should think if all children after the marriage, he was married to a widowed woman, what is wrong?
In this way, the widowed woman was also received support and take a home to the uncle was the one
Because their children, will have their world is busy and would do at this time.
This is the reason barbarousness.
Yesterday, if their wives refused to serve the people, then they will be?
This is a result of the pressure of the society.
When people such a move is based on such families are fun, children to be embarrassed on father&apos;s second marriage
Although they should face the situation and should say that his father was a process to the eyes of Islam.
This is a curse in our society, we have been fully in the last 40-50 years.
For a wife, it is accepted that Mian forbidden to be used, but that no other marriage.
If the bus to be given to carry after his death.
Mian along with their conclusion is not only a major cause of pollution developments in society.
Islam is a strain of Islam, we really do like those who are our practice and traditions.
For example, home, on the marriage of girls to part with education and like.
Are you get leave the house of a widow themselves instead of bringing home to the question, Mr. big, a widow, become quiet and satisfied by the uproar over him on (yes again in the stomach of a widow distorting bouncer).
In the subcontinent, Pakistan and India, we have accepted Islam, centuries ago. But this ignorantly thought to be very important to follow Islam to practice and tradition and not be released until today.
Absurdity to the second marriage, divorce, interpretation of defamation, divorce untouchable to other women, like men, marriage is only due to this thinking with the result of the slyness of the dignity of the woman married to a woman on the spot and his great age of men.
And, in the copy of the Western nations, we are terming the old continent and curtains.
Secrete very difficult to accept Islam, this thinking was easy to follow.
God, we all its courage and 1971 provided.
Amen.
Urdu writing was never then so difficult.
Bait. So you should write.
Very few.
Allah Hafiz.
Amir Timor writes in his book &quot;I&apos;m Timor&quot; is that in his life, the secret found that if any army commander in chief will be in the first line, the army will not ever failed.
But on the other hand, the same situation and.
It says people, is only to die for us, we have
A Murray, murder in people
Islam,
Today, after the prayer of Isha prayers at night by the shop was about a man who has a car in his hand.
In the way this man has been forgotten in the car stopped in his whole family was settled.
He said in Arabic, not that good side that there is not a problem?
He said in Riyadh that here in Medina, but no one has sought to cut my pocket, you are a charity to help forgive demanded brothers, because the individual in an incident that my first SR stressed that the petrol consolidated to leave, but it has barely started.
I have a threatened to the very angry.
This condition has now we come vehicles family for demanding the Muslims are less entire pillager defeat.
Clear and Hadith (this God him)) under the better down to beg.
God, we should build (Amen, Amen)
.
.
Renowned singer adnan sami reached Mumbai police station on his wife while accused of violence
, the police instructed them to go to court.
Adnan sami&apos;s wife had filed against her husband that adnan sami continuous violence on them.
Institutional and non-human behavior have been established.
Now that it has been out of their tolerance should be filed a case against adnan sami
They instructed to go to court, instead of a case to the police, saying that the issue is not reliable hand degraded police.
In your opinion, adnan sami accused of his wife is correct?
The Indian effort to defamed the allegation adnan sami anywhere, not?
Informed their opinion about this.
- Adam, Sanghar, Mehr.
As far as charges are concerned, any person can see on the other.
There is no thing of increasing respect
Are some of the current wife and adnan sami adnan sami left their respect for life and the money was India, now embraced it the same day.
This is the issue of its actions.
Washington.
Senior American officials said that the President will be a hard stance on Afghan President Hamid Karzai
About Afghanistan, America has been given much importance to the war instead of development in the new strategy.
Officials say that Hamid Zai obstacle in the achievement of American goals in Afghanistan is being considered, because the government is corruption, the drug trade has been increasing and the strength of the Taliban is again being collected.
American officials said that in the American administration, and people who are put under pressure for Hamid Karzai has much more include the Vice President, and President representative Richard Hall about Afghanistan and Pakistan.
He said that the strategy has emerged after President Bush, who was talking a video conference with Hamid Zai after every two weeks and it was stressing the US role in the reconstruction of Afghanistan and its civilian institutions.
Officials say that the administration will work with the provincial leaders as the alternative of the central government.
Officials say that he will Hamid Zai stressed the further war against corruption.
Hamid Karzai is facing new elections this year, and it is not yet clear that and his colleagues will support for his presidency or not.
This statement of American officials presented a tent, not a change in U.S. policy regarding Afghanistan?
What is the far end of Hamid Karzai?
It is the opinion of you?
In a series of three one-day matches between Pakistan and Sri Sri Lanka has defeated Pakistan 1-2.
In the first one-day match, Pakistan has faced with defeat to Sri Lanka, but the next two Sri Lanka won.
In the third one-day match, the performance of the national team was very poor, nose and warning that it faced defeat on the national team, only 23 overs runs in response to Sri Lanka.
As a result of the series, it is proved that the performance of the national team is not in succession.
Despite the home ground and all national team was facing defeat, in your view of this, what are the reasons?
Authorities which departments need more attention?
You are satisfied with the selection of the team?
You will put the responsibility of the defeat on which department, fielding, batting and bowling.
Informed his opinion.
- country Babar Hussain, Jeddah, this land is a matter of regret that the modern era of today are also continuing ignorantly such cultures, their related his savagely they are targeting innocent people with us who will say?
Sometimes a Sardar walks on these to you, the time does not as action against them?
Judicial Justice when work.
The Sri Lankan team reached Pakistan play a one-day international series.
Despite Pak-India tension, the arrival of any foreign team is pleasing.
At the Karachi airport arrival of the Sri Lankan team was welcomed.
Two one-day match between Pakistan and Sri Lanka will be the third one-day in Lahore and Karachi.
Both teams are to be made by the big noise about bowling, batting and fielding.
Sri Lanka, who has to take on their spinners, Pakistan has relied on fast bowling.
The Sri Lankan captain J. says that no one player of the Pakistan team, the team is dangerous.
While muralidharan and card will be the captain of Pakistan said that the competition will be tough.
Shoaib Malik has said that MURLITHARAN has played, will also see, we have prepared a secret game plan, it will be held in this field.
According to Sri Lanka, what really Pak will be interesting and sensational.
In the series between Pakistan and Sri Lanka, whose border will be heavy?
Series who will win?
Who will be the man of the series?
Informed his opinion.
-rosy, London, the statement of their choices are you prefer these are our desire is that something you should not write truth like statement over again because no crane, ahead of the brutal Lord is ordered to say the right thing, and this is equally Jihad statement said that the change in the reports to be tried.
- country Yusuf, Dubai.
All this is the axis of those Kashmiris are fighting the war of independence from the last 60 years.
No one has not been asked, now they have stuck the war of extremism and terrorism, compromise started cleaning things.
First, Muslims were massacred and resolve the issues in the cycle.
However, Pakistan will have to understand their policy.
London - Asad Khan,
India is creating this kind of situation that the attention of the world should be removed from Kashmir
But Pakistan has always face of the reality of India in the world.
The British government is now understand why the name of Indian terrorism from Pakistan to occupy the infamous and Kashmir are stealing eyes
And they were talking on this issue with Pakistan.
British Foreign Minister David got band has said that the solution of the Kashmir problem would end terrorism, and the government will deal with the dangers of an effective way to give birth on the Pakistan border.
It should be noted that before the newly elected US President have also expressed similar views on the Kashmir issue.
The British Foreign Minister talking to media in Mumbai and the subject has written that the war against terrorism is falsely dangers facing himself was President Bush&apos;s policy to kill people by force.
David got band has said that Pakistan should not show any leniency for extremist groups.
By big powers, due to stress on the need for the resolution of the Kashmir issue, India is not trying to remove the attention to this issue, tension in the region.
In Mumbai, terrorism are not part of this strategy?
Is India wants to escape from the process of composite dialogue based by terrorism?
Their opinion informed me.
- Usman Aftab.
In my opinion, big powers are not to the full loss to Pakistan.
But they are thinking of some measures to maintain control it is known that Pakistan is a nuclear power,
Here, want a situation of a revolution.
The foreign countries want to meet their purpose and are thinking that political, geographical, some difficulties to the corner from Pakistan want also to help Pakistan can
- a citizen, USA.
That is the great tradition of the Hindu axilla Ram on the knife mouth
My view is that a bus is therefore shortly abdominal pain, and he is to threaten Pakistan.
We are ready to every kind of India, Chief of Army will stop its mouth; otherwise we know answer that they
- Fahim Siddiqui.
Summit is being imposed, the statement from the enormity of the United States of America is very bad but now India is also the same mind, after the attack, some reality will know who is in much water
Hamas on Israel is attacked, but a shame that it saw Israel, India also saw India wants the same thing.
The Pakistan government for this star discrimination ruling Prime Minister Syed Yusuf Gilani said that Pakistan has been playing an important role in former President Musharraf&apos;s uniform and to restore democracy, a newly elected Vice President.
In uniform and the restoration of democracy, a political party should not credit, the parliament is not a rubber.
All decisions will be taken in the parliament.
The Prime Minister said that Dr chapter has been closed.
Do you think we had no importance of public protest against?
The lawyers did not play any role in the movement.
The statement of the Prime Minister, you will want to say what.
Informed his opinion.
They give advice to Newly elected President, Barak in his farewell press conference, U.S. President George W. Bush has said that he has many mistakes over his post and Barak to take the right.
Has given preference over its popularity as President according to the circumstances and U.S. measures under the constitution and the law, American interests
Barak to stop these attacks, he said, America&apos;s enemies are still planning to attack on America, the biggest challenge will be.
He said that Iraq was my biggest mistake to widely accepted is the biggest disappointment for me do not get the weapons of mass destruction and to complete the mission in Iraq.
Addressing his last press conference in the White House, The American President said that this is my last press conference to participate in the conference and I thank journalists and other associates who have participated in it.
Do you think that they will not repeat the mistakes did the Bush?
Has not delayed to admit the mistake?
Will Bush could follow the advice?
Informed his opinion.
American Vice President Dick Cheney has said that I want to see Osama bin Laden dead or alive.
He said that Osama bin Laden has been printed in a hard and tough area, and he has been ineffective, for his organization if Osama bin Laden to be arrested, dead or alive, it will finish the Organization of this.
America is determined to Osama&apos;s arrest and the search for Osama should continue the pain.
Cheney&apos;s desire to arrest Osama will be fulfilled.
Their opinion informed me.
All rounder cricketer like Shahid Afridi, the first day of the Quaid-e-Azam Trophy in PIA and Habib bank match after the end of the game, one of them was a clash with spectators.
UBL on the ground after the match Shahid Afridi as drawing came out of the room, a large number of people have gathered around them.
It has earlier rap receipt of the application of a picture with their retention by the spectators on one occasion on which Shahid Afridi, he said, to take this picture tomorrow, spectators, however, insists on the Afridi came in the matter that they have all the people present there got appeasement times.
After this, Shahid Afridi said that this issue is being made at this time, I was the speed of the prayers.
However apology from the spectators.
Shahid Afridi will also ask you on this attitude.
We should inform their opinion.
Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh has once again alleged that Pakistan was the environment of the war is giving
Terrorism and Pakistan is used as state policy.
The chief ministers conference in New Delhi, Manmohan Singh said that terrorism is backing from neighboring countries, especially Pakistan
Terrorists and Mumbai attacks had adopted the sea route and the Indian coast guard is safe from it.
The Indian Prime Minister said that in November, the Mumbai attack were the force.
He further said that terrorists are using new techniques and modern communication system, on the Line of Control, we will also increase strictly there is interference, he said that terrorism will not be tolerated in any condition, and this is our policy.
The allegation of the Indian prime minister, how you are looking?
Like the internal movements is indicative of the Indian anxiety?
India who behave threatening calls on signals were made?
Informed his opinion.
- Zubair Khan, Karachi.
This is a very painful tragedy that Israeli Palestinians are massacred, on the other hand, Kashmir is the same situation, but not until well on the head of the council.
As well as organizations who are present in Palestine and Kashmir that they must continue fighting for their freedom, and they continue to face any aggression while creating a not one day his martyrdom will bring back stronger
The Israeli air strike on Gaza is still underway, so far, hundreds of Palestinian men, women and children have been killed.
Hamas has been martyred including children of important political wife.
The meeting ended without any decision of the Security Council.
Condemnatory resolution presented by meeting by Israel against Libya and other Arab countries are facing us opposition.
The Palestinian civilian population is continuing the bombardment of the Israeli planes to many.
On the incidents of Mumbai screams but Israeli attacks on the whole world, including America, Britain, or it will not be massacred there?
Why the important countries of the Muslim community are silent?
The double standard of the world will want to say you do.
- Saeed, New York.
In my opinion, it is clear that our most people are illiterate, they know not only that the government tax where his money is to fulfil its responsibilities, it is in the interest of electricity and gas crisis will easily.
Their role as the people who have elected are known to all.
Of electricity and gas in Pakistan&apos;s perimeter and I adopted a crisis situation.
From January 1 on the other hand, the prices of gas has been started and has been year due to non-availability of petrol severe difficulties for people in some cities of the country.
Severe reaction on the crisis of a long closure of electricity and gas, riots and Violent Protests in Pakistan&apos;s industrial and business circles are continuing.
The industrialists have an ultimatum to close factories.
On the other hand, citizens from load shedding of 8 to 10 hours in Karachi is found in trouble.
Industrial life has now been paralysed about.
In this regard, the government institutions are described his position after accusing each other.
To increase the prices of electricity and gas, something is not a joke with the nation?
Why attention towards the solution of the problems is not being given?
The government does not see a wheel jam of national development.
To overcome the crisis, you will propose measures was immediately?
Informed his opinion.
-Imran, Madina Munawara, I want to say that such people rendered ruling.
To me, it is surprising that public government slogan out to hurt the people giving
Secretly, gas and petrol will not get a torture.
There is no control on the government institutions
The day on the law and order situation is written, his mercy upon this country &quot;
The New Year.
Last year was a year of chaos and political hope and Faraz, with regard to terrorism, it will be remembered.
An eight-year period of separation from the power of President Musharraf and President Bush, Bush shoe rain and the establishment of a democratic government in Pakistan, unexpected disasters, earthquake in Baluchistan, world financial crisis, marketing.
Now is the arrival of the New Year, you see how the coming years?
You will bring political or geographical situation, What color near strategy will be?
What is the hope of any progress in the elimination of terrorism?
What will end the crisis in Pakistan?
Pak-India relations will take the way?
There is a possibility of surgical or full war?
With the New Year, you are linked to the expectations?
Informed his opinion.
Benazir Bhutto is being celebrated the first anniversary of the martyr, they view were killed after an electoral meeting in Liaquat Bagh.
Benazir Bhutto, today, we are not, they were a serious, capable of political freedoms and international fame personality, his unique role in national politics.
Despite a period of one year, the crux of his testimony could not be solved until today.
Their work in the establishment of democracy in Pakistan and the government were not useless.
Today is to establish a democratic government in Pakistan, and her husband Asif Zardari are elected to the post of president.
The role of Benazir Bhutto in Pakistan&apos;s politics, how you are looking?
Behind his martyrdom, you can hand?
Recently, he was a ruling from the international award of human rights, we tell about their political and democratic services What to say.
Leaving the white government on President year America were transferred to Camp David presidential camp office so that the wishes of the new president to the White House, Barak to serve and be prepared by parade.
Bush attack on historic attack on the World Trade Center in America and destruction, hue, presided over the eight-year period and then in front of the international war against terrorism, while military action in Iraq and Afghanistan, the armed forces of various countries have become memorabilia examples of the Bush era in this war and full use of American resources in this war.
The war, the history of America itself faced the worst economic and financial crisis.
Do you think the world with the war found crew and what?
Continue the policies of President Bush succeed?
During President Bush&apos;s government, is the opinion of you?
The Indian government has stopped from the Indian cricket team tour of Pakistan.
The Indian cricket team to play three tests and five one-day matches and a 20 match in Pakistan tour.
Talking to GEO News Rajiv, Vice President of the Indian Cricket Board said that the board had to seek permission from the government of Pakistan tour, but the visit is not possible due to the current tense situation between the two countries.
What is the correct step to cancel the visit of the team by the Indian government to justify the present political situation, the game should not keep separate from politics?
The decision of the Indian Government is harmful for cricket?
Continue cricket team tour of worsen the security situation in India, so why cannot the Indian team visiting Pakistan?
It is the opinion of you.
- Salman, Karachi.
People who do proud to India.
And the people of India that his films or his video should be opened his eyes there have now been many do respect you
I remember a inter elections of adnan sami, in which he said that Pakistan is not my British citizenship.
Adnan sami must be the first rest in Pakistan because thee respect there was not suitable.
- Farid Ahmed.
Karachi.
Mumbai, India&apos;s attitude has been changed after the attack.
Singh, has been the reaction in the event that he hates Pakistan and Pakistan.
To know that adnan sami sing the song are now, there is no need to come to a point where, he should have been in India, adnan sami.
- Mohammad Shamshad Alam.
In Karachi, on Singh&apos;s statement only will say that he is also change color like cameleon
After the statement from the ratio of the occasion, what Pakistanis opening eyes that you in India is how much importance to understand the mentality.
Confidently statement after their hatred has been increased after the incident of Mumbai now poison against the popular Sami throw up.
According to foreign news agency, the American President Bush visiting Iraq&apos;s farewell with Prime Minister Noor al-maleki, ridiculous situation was during a press conference in his office situated in Baghdad when an Iraqi journalist said while addressing President Bush, &quot;the dog is a farewell kiss.&quot;
After this, the journalist has thrown by Bush in his shoe bring down, President Bush shoe levels from the expertise was already leaning his head and guarded yourself.
The second shoe attached to the American flag.
While the journalist, security personnel were taken from this place.
On this occasion, President Bush said that he did not know that it was what, why, I was not a problem.
In your opinion of this process was not expressing anger against President Bush from the Iraqi people?
This incident will ask you do?
The tension created after the terrorist incidents in Mumbai in the relations between India and Pakistan adopted a serious situation at this time, when the Indian Air force combat planes violating the air routes of the Lahore and Kashmir sectors in Pakistan.
The Pakistani air force retaliated to Indian plane were forced to go back.
According to sources, two Indian planes were ruffle with arms and ammunition and bombs.
This is the first incident of its kind in the present tense situation.
The Pakistan Air Force said that the Air Force is fully prepared to defend the country.
Information Minister Sherry Rehman said that Indian officials have acknowledged that the violation of the air routes was, however, it was a mistake.
Pakistan&apos;s military sources has declared the incident serious.
In your opinion, what really has the intention of the air attack on India and Pakistan?
Do as India&apos;s stand is correct that it was violated by mistake or the purpose of the capacity of the Pakistan Air Force?
This incident would not cause a further increase in tension between the two countries.
Informed his opinion.
After martyr Benazir Bhutto Zardari by his son and the Chairman of the People&apos;s Party has received at least, hart was international award of human rights.
In a ceremony during the meeting of the General Assembly in the office of the United Nations, Pakistan&apos;s former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto were Nawaz this award in recognition of his services for their human rights.
Birthday was celebrated of the human rights resolution from the United Nations.
They include former US Attorney General Clark besides Benazir Bhutto and the international organization Human Rights Watch to work for human rights all over the world, on this occasion, the awards are being given to those personalities and institutions in recognition of working for human rights.
Pakistan&apos;s ambassador to the United Nations, Abdullah Haroon Hussain and other senior Pakistani diplomatic officials were also present.
Former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto will also ask you on receiving the award.
- Sameer.
Hires.
It is true that he was but we remember it is that he has the blood of many innocent people in Karachi, on which they were not proud that this Nasirullah Babar has done a good job.
Just after.
But it is also true that he has presented to the senior people of his party as well, and his son to elected representatives of the People&apos;s Party, the what is democracy?
-Noor, Karachi, the news of the Quran, it has been proved that the dissident dissident will support it.
But until the iron axe-not, it could not cut on hatchet
As our rulers, because this is something that they are their secret way, another country are underway.
May God give our rulers.
The name of the UN Security Council panel Hafiz Mohammad Saeed, including three Pakistani citizens and Jamaat-ud-Dawa and five organizations included in the list of terrorists.
These include Jamaat-ud-Dawa Mohammad Saeed, operations chief of the banned organization Lashkar-e-witty Rehman, Head of the Finance Department, Haji Mohammad Ashraf, Al-Qaeda and Taliban committee of the Security Council has approved to include the name of those Pakistanis in the list of terrorists.
Besides this, the name of a Saudi nationals is also included in the list of terrorists.
These organizations include Jamaat-ud-Dawa, guard Kashmir, Al Rashid Trust Trust International.
Member countries, they will be imposed on the will and travel and freeze all the assets of vitality personalities and organizations will be arrested immediately.
They will face cases.
Do these restrictions are not under the Indian propaganda?
India accused of the Mumbai attacks without any evidence are why imposed on these organizations?
What is not present terrorist organisations in India?
The atrocities on minorities in India, what is not familiar with international institutions?
We should inform their opinion.
Eid is the spokesman and unity and we do sacrifice animals while working on it.
On the political situation in the uproar period when inflation is on the rise, I, the poor and all are already preparing for Eid according to its strength and his associates giving the Eid greetings in different ways.
We are also providing an opportunity through you that give congratulation of Eid in the form of short messages to their loved ones.
You can congratulate through from the ratio of Eid.
- Murtaza Jilani.
Karachi, our politicians, it should understand that those who are against the operation are appreciative of Pakistan, which are all kinds of oppression, but Pakistan do love
If the war was, they will fight shoulder of Pakistan
So leave when they will feel the love, only the protest will not get some politics, in my opinion, there is a possibility of a decisive war between the two.
